Privacy Policy
Your privacy is important to JAMF Software, LLC. As a result, we’ve developed this Privacy Policy that covers how we collect, use, disclose, transfer, and store your information. Please take a moment to familiarize yourself with our privacy practices and
let us know
if you have any questions.
A. Overview
JAMF Software, LLC, and its affiliates (herein collectively “Jamf”) makes reasonable efforts to protect the privacy of your personal information. This Privacy Policy was created to demonstrate our commitment to fair information practices. This Privacy Policy covers Jamf’s use of personal information that we collect in the normal course of our business, when you use our corporate websites or applications, when you use our software and Hosted Services, and when you otherwise interact with us, including when you attend events hosted or attended by Jamf and when you contact us through our third-party partners for customer support (collectively, the “Services”). Jamf’s obligations to our customers when processing personal information related to the use our products and services are provided in our customer agreements located at
Jamf Trust Center
.
In addition to covering how we collect, use, disclose, transfer, and store your information, this policy also discloses our purpose and lawful basis for processing your personal information, and your related rights. Our legal basis for collecting and using personal information will depend on the personal information concerned and the specific context in which we collect it. In most cases, the lawful basis will be that the processing (i) is necessary for our legitimate interests in carrying out our business with you, including direct marketing, provided those interests are not outweighed by your rights and interests, or (ii) is necessary to perform a contract with you. Where processing is based on your consent, we will identify the processing purposes and provide you with relevant information to make the processing fair and transparent. If you have consented to our use of information about you for a specific purpose, you have the right to change your mind at any time, but this will not affect any processing that has already taken place.
If you are a resident of California, please see Section P (the
California Addendum
) for additional details on how Jamf handles your personal information.
Our Services are not directed to anyone under the age of 16, and Jamf does not knowingly solicit or collect information from anyone under 16 years of age. If you are a parent or guardian and believe we may have collected information about a child, please contact us at
privacy@jamf.com
.
B. Collection and Sources of Information
Depending on the context in which you interact with us, Jamf may collect or receive the following information:
Account and Profile Information:
This includes information you provide when you create an account with our Services, request a trial, contact support, register for events, complete surveys and may include name, username, email address, phone number, company name, state, country, LinkedIn URL, Twitter URL, GitHub URL, and your photo.
Service Information:
When you use our Services, we receive information generated through your use of the Services, either entered by you or others who use the Services, or from the Services infrastructure itself. This information may include, but is not limited to, name, username, company/organization, company/organization address, email address, phone number, IP address, MAC address, latitude, longitude, AppleCare ID, Apple ID, device name(s), device ID(s), and directory ID or other information you place within the Services. The information collected is kept to a minimum and depends on the use case and platforms used.
Performance and Usage Data:
We may collect statistical, usage, configuration, and performance data of the Services to monitor the performance, integrity, and stability of the Services; address or prevent technical or security issues; provide support Services; and improve the Services. Further, we may use and disclose this information for any purpose, provided that such data is first de-identified, anonymized and aggregated.
Payment Information:
We use third party payment processors to process payments made to us. In connection with the processing of such payments, we do not retain any personally identifiable information or any financial information such as credit card numbers. Rather, all such information is provided directly to our third-party processors whose use of your personal information is governed by their privacy policies. The privacy policies of our current third party processors may be viewed at
https://stripe.com/us/privacy
,
https://home.bluesnap.com/privacy-policy/
, and
https://www.cleverbridge.com/corporate/privacy-policy/
.
Information from Third Parties:
We receive information from third party business partners such as the contact details of prospects and sales leads. In addition, we collect information from public databases or other data you may have made publicly available, such as information posted on professional networks and social media platforms.
Location Information:
Some of our applications collect general location information based on IP address. This information is used to customize the services provided to you, such as location-based information of specific managed devices. Location information is only viewable by the end user. We do not use, disclose, or sell location information for the purposes of providing targeted marketing or advertisements.
Automatically Collected Information:
When you access our Services, we may collect information about your engagement on our corporate websites, content you provided during chat interactions with our third-party partners, forums, and forms, and user experience and session replay technology, where applicable, to understand how you interact with our websites or apps.
Childrens’ Data:
Our customers include educational institutions who control the Service Information provided to us. These educational institution customers may provide us with Service Information related to devices used by students under the age of 16, including, but is not limited to, device name(s) and device ID(s).”
Other Information:
We may collect demographic information such as geographic location, to help us analyze trends and tailor our offerings to specific user segments.
C. Use of Collected Information
We may use the information we collect automatically or when you use the Services for the following purposes:
To carry out the purpose for which it was originally collected or received.
To provide, operate, and maintain and improve our products and services.
To respond to your inquiries and provide support.
To process and complete transactions, and send you related information.
To market and sell our products and services. If we do so, we will comply with relevant opt-in or opt-out requirements related to sending such communications.
To monitor the performance, integrity, and stability of the Services.
To address or prevent technical or security issues.
To comply with laws and regulations that apply to us or third parties with whom we work, and comply with requests from regulatory agencies, law enforcement, and other public and government authorities.
Jamf does not sell or rent information to third parties, and we do not share information with third parties except as described in this Privacy Policy.
Jamf may supplement the information we collect from you with additional data to enhance our understanding of our user base and improve our Services.
Jamf utilizes marketing automation tools provided by third-party partners to streamline our communications and deliver targeted content or promotions based on your interests and interactions with our platform.
Jamf may personalize your experience by using data to customize recommendations, content, or features to better suit your preferences.
Jamf does not use personal information to train its artificial intelligence models. Content such as performance and usage data may be used to support intelligent features that provide knowledge-based insights and advanced query results to users. These tools leverage artificial intelligence, machine learning, and other technologies to process data-driven content solely for delivering these intelligent features.
D. Cookies and Similar Technologies
Jamf and our third-party partners, such as our advertising and analytics partners, use cookies and similar technologies to make our websites and applications work, and to learn more about our users and their likely interests as well as information relating to their visits and interactions with a website or application.
Use of Cookies.
We may collect various forms of information such as entry and exit points for our websites (i.e., referring URLs or domain names), website traffic statistics, operating system, and browser type (collectively “Traffic Data”). Traffic Data is anonymous information that does not personally identify you but is helpful for marketing purposes or for improving your experience on the sites. In addition, when you request pages on our sites, our servers automatically log your IP address. Depending on the cookie, the cookie may expire at the end of your browser session or may stay (or “persist”) on your computer until the expiration date specified in the cookie.
Controlling or Modifying Cookies.
If you accept a cookie, you can delete it at any time (e.g., as soon as you leave our websites) through your web browser. If you do not wish to receive cookies or wish to manage when you accept cookies in general, you can set your browser to reject cookies or to alert you when a cookie is placed on your computer. If you choose to decline cookies, you may not be able to use certain features or functionality of our Services that depend on your web browser accepting cookies. You can also use opt-out tools provided by third party partners, or by the Digital Advertising Alliance (
http://www.aboutads.info/choices
), the EU Internet advertising industry (
http://www.youronlinechoices.eu
), or similar entities. Where required, Jamf obtains consent prior to using cookies.
Analytics.
Jamf uses analytical services provided by Google to monitor our Services, such as Firebase, Google Analytics for Firebase, and Crashlytics. You can find out more about the types of analytical data collected, how that data is processed, and how to opt out of certain features by visiting
www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/
.
Do Not Track Signals.
Jamf Services do not respond to Do Not Track Signals.
E. Sharing of Personal Information & Accountability for Onward Transfer
From time to time, Jamf may engage third-party business partners, vendors, or sub-processors to perform functions such as sending postal mail and e-mail, removing repetitive information from customer lists, analyzing data, providing marketing assistance, data storage, processing credit card payments, providing search results and links (including paid listings and links), and providing customer service. Such companies shall only use your information for those purposes required to perform their functions. Additionally, Jamf may share your information, without your prior consent, in the event of any reorganization, merger, sale, joint venture, or transfer of assets. When information is shared, Jamf will ascertain that the third parties receiving the information are obligated to provide at least the same level of privacy protection as is required under this policy. Should Jamf transfer information outside of a local jurisdiction, it shall only be done with adequate protections in place and in compliance with applicable laws and standards.
Jamf may share your information if we have a good faith belief that such action is necessary to (i) protect and defend the rights or property of Jamf, (ii) enforce this Privacy Policy or the Services’ terms and conditions of access and use agreement, (iii) participate in dispute resolution pursuant to this Privacy Policy, (iv) protect the interests of other users of the Services or any other person, or (v) operate or conduct maintenance and repair of the Services or equipment as necessary to provide Services to you.
Jamf may be required to disclose an individual’s information in response to a lawful request by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements. If Jamf receives a request for an individual’s information, Jamf will (unless prohibited by law from doing so) inform the relevant individual or customer as soon as reasonably practicable and take reasonable actions to address or assist in addressing such request.
Jamf shall remain liable under applicable law and relevant contract obligations for its sub-processors, if they process your information in a manner inconsistent with applicable law and contract obligations, unless Jamf proves that it is not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
F. Parents’ Rights and Childrens’ Privacy
Some of our Services are used by educational institutions that serve children. “Children” are individuals under the age of 16 (or below the legal age of majority as mandated by the laws of the jurisdiction in which they reside). Jamf is committed to protecting the privacy of children who use our Services. We've taken the Student Privacy Pledge to demonstrate our commitment to parents, educators, and schools. Visit
https://studentprivacypledge.org
to learn more.
We will NOT knowingly collect, use or distribute personal information from children under the age of 16 without prior consent from a parent and/or guardian or the educational entity using our Services.
Jamf will never knowingly request personally identifiable information from anyone under the age of 16.
Data processed about children is set forth in Section B.
We only share childrens’ data with parents, guardians, educators, or other authorized third parties, which was obtained in the course of providing our Services to educational institutions that serve children. We only disclose personal information if permitted and/or required by law and in the course of providing our Services and as required or permitted by the contractual obligations associated with our Services.
Jamf will not provide Services that knowingly ask a child under 16 years-of-age to divulge more information than is required to ensure the features of the Jamf applications operate for their intended purposes, and for educational purposes.
G. International Data Transfer
Your personal information might be transferred to, and processed in, countries other than the country in which you are a resident. These countries may have data protection and privacy laws that are different than the laws of your home country. Jamf only transfers personal information to other countries in accordance with applicable data protection and privacy laws, provided there are legally adequate protections in place for the personal information. A list of Jamf’s global offices is available
here
.
If you are a resident of the European Economic Area (“EEA”) and your personal information is transferred outside of the EEA, we will:
Process it in a territory which the European Commission has determined provides an adequate level of protection for personal information; or
Otherwise implement appropriate safeguards to protect your personal information, including by EEA Standard Contractual Clauses (“EEA SCCs”) or another lawful transfer mechanism approved by the European Commission.
If you are a resident of the United Kingdom (“UK”) and your personal information is transferred outside of the UK, we will:
Process it in a territory which the Information Commissioner’s Office (“ICO”) has determined provides an adequate level of protection for personal information; or
Otherwise implement appropriate safeguards to protect your personal information, including by appending the UK Addendum to the EEA SCCs or another lawful transfer mechanism approved by the Information Commissioner’s Office.
If you are a resident of Switzerland and your personal information is transferred outside of Switzerland, we will:
Process it in a territory which the Swiss government has determined provides an adequate level of protection for personal information; or
Otherwise implement appropriate safeguards to protect your personal information, including by using the EEA SCCs, subject to modifications and amendments prescribed by the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner.
In addition to the transfer mechanisms described above, to further demonstrate Jamf’s commitment to privacy, Jamf complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“Swiss-U.S. DPF”) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. Jamf has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (“EU-U.S. DPF Principles”) with regard to the processing of personal information received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Jamf has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (“Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles”) with regard to the processing of personal information from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. In addition, Jamf's U.S. affiliate, Wandera, Inc., also adheres to the EU-U.S. DPF Principles, including as applicable under the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles.
If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the relevant DPF Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (“DPF”) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
. Additionally, our organization commits to cooperating with the appropriate European data protection authority/ies (“DPAs”) (i.e., the EU DPAs, and, as applicable, the United Kingdom Information Commissioner’s Office and Gibraltar Regulatory Authority, and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner) and comply with the advice given by such authority/ies regarding human resources data. Jamf’s Employee Privacy Notice is available here
https://www.jamf.com/employee-privacy-notice/
. In compliance with the EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, Jamf commits to resolve DPF Principles-related complaints about our collection or use of your personal information. European Union, Swiss and United Kingdom individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF, UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and Swiss DPF should first contact us via Section R below.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and Swiss-U.S. DPF, Jamf commits to refer unresolved privacy complaints concerning our handling of personal information received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF, UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and Swiss-U.S. DPF to an independent dispute resolution mechanism, Data Privacy Framework Services, operated by BBB National Programs, which is based in the United States. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit
https://bbbprograms.org/programs/all-programs/dpf-consumers/ProcessForConsumers
or more information or to file a complaint. The services of BBB National Programs is provided at no cost to you.
Under certain conditions, you may invoke binding arbitration for certain residual claims as to data covered by the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU.U.S. DPF and Swiss-U.S. DPF. The purpose of this option is to provide a prompt, independent, and fair mechanism, at your option, for resolution of any claimed violations of the EU-U.S. DPF, UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF or Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles not resolved by any of the other EU-U.S. DPF, UK Extension or Swiss-U.S. DPF mechanisms. For additional information on binding arbitration, see Annex I to the EU-U.S. DPF Principles found here
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/ANNEX-I-introduction-dpf?tabset-35584=2
.
H. Protection and De-Identification of Information
Taking into account the risks involved in the processing, the nature of information processed, and to prevent loss, misuse, unauthorized access, disclosure, alteration, and destruction while maintaining data accuracy, Jamf has put in place appropriate physical, electronic, and managerial policies and procedures to safeguard the information Jamf collects. Any payment transactions will be encrypted using SSL technology. However, the safety and security of your information also depends on you. Where you have chosen or we have given you a username and password for access to certain parts of the Services, you are responsible for keeping the username and password confidential. Although we do our best to protect the information, we cannot and do not guarantee the security of your information.
Where we maintain or use de-identified information, we will continue to maintain and use the de-identified information only in a de-identified fashion and will not attempt to re-identify the information.
For more information on how we protect information, see Jamf's
Trust Center
.
I. Retention
Jamf retains your information (including your sensitive information) in an identifiable form for as long as needed or permitted in light of the purposes for which it was collected. The criteria used to determine our retention periods include:
The length of time we have an ongoing relationship with you and provide Services to you, for example, for as long as you have an account with us or are using our Services, and the length of time thereafter during which we may have a legitimate need to reference your information to address issues that may arise;
When there is a legal obligation to which we are subject, for example, certain laws may require us to keep records of your transactions for a certain period of time before we can delete them; and
When retention is advisable in light of our legal position, such as in regard to applicable statutes of limitations, litigation, or regulatory investigations.
J. Other Limits to Your Privacy
The Services may contain links to other non-Jamf websites. Jamf is not responsible for the privacy practices or the content of such websites. Jamf has no control over the use of such websites, and you should exercise caution when deciding to disclose any information on these websites.
K. Choice
We seek to provide you with choices regarding the information you provide to us. You can always opt not to disclose information. However, if you elect to opt out of disclosing information, such election may impact functionality or prevent the use of Jamf’s products or Services. You have the right, at any time, to opt-out of receiving marketing messages from Jamf by sending an email to
privacy@jamf.com
, by unsubscribing through the unsubscribe or opt-out link in an email, or by unsubscribing
here
. We will try to comply with your request(s) as soon as reasonably practicable. Please note that if you opt-out of receiving marketing-related emails from us, we may still send you important operational or administrative messages.
L. Legal Compliance
We may disclose your information in response to valid legal requests or court orders, complying with subpoenas, warrants, and other legal processes as required. This is done only to protect rights, comply with legal obligations, or respond to lawful requests, and to prevent illegal activities, fraud, or potential harm. If Jamf receives any government agency requests, it will (unless prohibited by law from doing so) inform the customer in writing as soon as reasonably practical. We will cooperate with law enforcement agencies and authorities within the bounds of applicable laws and regulations while prioritizing the protection of your privacy.
M. Privacy Requests
If you would like to request to access, correct, update, suppress, restrict, or delete your personal information, object to or opt out of the processing of your personal information, or receive a copy of your personal information for purposes of transmitting it to another company (to the extent these rights are provided to you by applicable law), you may contact us via Section R below or by submitting a Data Subject Access Request (DSAR)
here
.
To protect your privacy and security, Jamf may also take reasonable steps to verify your identity before responding to DSARs.
Jamf processes some personal information solely on behalf of its customers in the course of delivering Services. This personal information is processed to accomplish the business purposes of the customer to whom the Services are provided, and often, Jamf will not have a direct relationship with the subject of this personal information. In these cases, Jamf recommends first contacting the organization to which your personal information was originally provided with any data privacy questions. The organization can contact Jamf if escalation of your query is necessary.
N. Regulatory Oversight
For this Privacy Policy, its content, and Jamf’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Jamf is subject to the jurisdiction of the Federal Trade Commission (“FTC”). If Jamf becomes subject to an FTC or court order based on non-compliance with this policy, applicable privacy laws, the EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. DPFs, or the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, Jamf shall make public any relevant information of any compliance or assessment reports submitted to the FTC, to the extent consistent with confidentiality requirements.
O. Data Disclosure Notification
Should we become aware of a data breach or security incident involving the disclosure of your personal information, Jamf will notify you as required by applicable laws. Our notification will include details of the breach, corrective actions, and contact information for further assistance. Our Information Security Breach Management process can be found
here
.
P. California Addendum—For Residents of California
This California Addendum applies to California residents and supplements the information provided above in the Privacy Policy. It does not apply to our employees or other personnel where the personal information we collect about those individuals relates to their current, former, or potential employment at Jamf.
Categories of Personal Information Collected and Sources
In the preceding 12 months, Jamf has collected the following categories of personal information about California consumers. We may collect this personal information directly from you, from third parties, and from your interactions with our Services. As defined by the California Consumer Privacy Act, as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act (collectively, the “CCPA”), the personal information categories are:
Personal information as defined in the California customer records law,
such as name, contact details (address, phone number, email), and employment information, such as current employer.
Characteristics of protected classifications
under California or federal law, such as primary language.
Commercial information
, such as purchase history and transaction information.
Internet or network activity information
, such as browsing history, online identifiers, search history, and interactions with our online properties or ads.
Geolocation data
as approximate location derived from IP address.
Audio, electronic, visual, and similar information
, such as photos and call or video recordings.
Purposes for Collection, Use, and Disclosure of Personal Information
Jamf collects the categories of personal information described above for business and operational purposes, marketing and commercial purposes, security purposes, and legal and compliance purposes, as further described above in Section C. We disclose each of these categories to our service providers, affiliates, third-party partners that provide services such as data analysis, data storage, payment processing, and customer service, trusted business partners, and public and governmental authorities, such as regulatory authorities and law enforcement, as further described above in Section E.
Sensitive Personal Information
Jamf has not collected, shared, or sold any sensitive personal information, as defined under the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018, as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act. We have not engaged in such activities in the 12 months preceding the date this Privacy Policy was last updated. Without limiting the foregoing, we do not “sell” or “share” sensitive personal information.
Categories of Personal Information Sold/Shared for Cross-Context Behavioral Advertising
We disclose the above categories of personal information to third-party advertising partners, such as in connection with our use of tracking technologies for cross-context behavioral advertising or by providing lists of email addresses for potential customers, so that we can reach you across the web with advertisements for our products and services. This may be considered “sharing” or a “sale” under the CCPA.
We do not knowingly “sell” or “share” the personal information, including the sensitive personal information, of minors under 16 years of age.
Individual Requests
You may, subject to applicable law, make the following requests:
You may request that we disclose to you the following information:
The categories of personal information we collected about you and the categories of sources from which we collected such personal information;
The business or commercial purpose for collecting, “selling,” or “sharing”
personal information about you;
The categories of personal information about you that we “sold” or “shared” and the categories of third parties to whom we “sold” or “shared” such personal information; and
The categories of personal information about you that we otherwise disclosed, and the categories of third parties to whom we disclosed such personal information.
You may request to correct inaccuracies in your personal information.
You may request to have your personal information deleted.
You may request to receive the specific pieces of your personal information, including a copy of the personal information you provided to us in a portable format.
You may opt out of the “sale” or "sharing” of your personal information for cross-context behavioral advertising through cookie consent.
We will not unlawfully discriminate against you for making an individual request. To make a request, please contact us at either
privacy@jamf.com
or 888-755-1421. We will verify and respond to your request consistent with applicable law, taking into account the type and sensitivity of the personal information subject to the request. We may need to request additional personal information from you in order to verify your identity and protect against fraudulent requests. If you maintain a password-protected account with us, we may verify your identity through our existing authentication practices for your account and require you to re-authenticate yourself before disclosing or deleting your personal information. If you make a request to delete, we may ask you to confirm your request before we delete your personal information.
We also process opt-out preference signals, such as the Global Privacy Control. These signals set your opt-out preferences only for the particular browser or device you are using. For information about how to use the Global Privacy Control, please visit
https://globalprivacycontrol.org/
.
Authorized Agents
If an agent would like to make a request on your behalf as permitted by applicable law, the agent may use the submission methods noted in the section entitled “Individual Requests.” As part of our verification process, we may request that the agent provide, as applicable, proof concerning their status as an authorized agent. In addition, we may require that you verify your identity as described in the section entitled “Individual Requests” or confirm that you provided the agent permission to submit the request.
Q. Changes to Our Privacy Policy
Jamf may update this Privacy Policy from time to time. In the event we make any material changes to this Privacy Policy, we will notify you by posting the revised policy here, so please be sure to visit our corporate website periodically. The date of the most recent revision to this Privacy Policy will be posted at the end of this policy. Any revisions will become effective upon seven (7) calendar days following such posting on our corporate website.
R. How to Contact Us
If you have any questions or complaints about this Privacy Policy, please contact us as follows:
JAMF Software, LLC
100 Washington Avenue South
Suite 900
Minneapolis, MN 55401
privacy@jamf.com
If you would like to request access to the personal information that we may maintain about you, please submit a request
here
.
Jamf has a designated Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) to respond to questions and complaints. If you have questions regarding our privacy practices or how we handle your information, please email our DPO at
privacy@jamf.com
.
Date Updated:
Dec. 17, 2024
Back to Top
Cookie Settings
By clicking “Accept All Cookies”, you agree to the storing of cookies on your device to enhance site navigation, analyze site usage, and assist in our marketing efforts.
Cookie Settings
Reject All
Accept All Cookies
Privacy Preference Center
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
More information
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
View Vendor Details‎
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
View Vendor Details‎
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
View Vendor Details‎
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
View Vendor Details‎
Back Button
Vendors List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://stripe.com/us/privacy:
Stripe Services Agreement
Stripe Connected Account Agreement
Stripe Payments Company Terms
Acquirer Terms
Acquirer Disclosure
Cross River Bank
Deutsche Bank
Goldman Sachs Bank USA
PNC Bank
Issuing Bank Terms
Payment Method Terms
User Bank Debit Authorizations
Prohibited & Restricted Businesses
Other Products and Programs
Stripe Terminal Device EULA
Stripe Terminal Purchase Terms
Stripe Terminal Reseller Terms
Stripe Atlas Agreement
Stripe Climate Contribution Terms
Stripe Partner Ecosystem
Stripe Apps
App Developer Agreement
App Marketplace Agreement
Privacy
Privacy Policy
Cookies Policy
Privacy Shield Policy
Service Providers List
Data Processing Agreement
Data Transfers Addendum
Stripe Privacy Center
Intellectual Property
Intellectual Property Notice
Marks Usage
E-SIGN Disclosure
Licenses
Consumer Terms
Last updated: January 16, 2025
This Privacy Policy includes important information about your personal data and we encourage you to read it carefully.
Welcome
We provide financial infrastructure for the internet. Individuals and businesses of all sizes use our technology and services to facilitate purchases, accept payments, send payouts, and manage online businesses.
This Privacy Policy (“Policy”) describes the Personal Data that we collect, how we use and share it, and details on how you can reach us with privacy-related inquiries. The Policy also outlines your rights and choices as a data subject, including the right to object to certain uses of your Personal Data.
Depending on the activity, Stripe assumes the role of a “data controller” and/or “data processor” (or “service provider”). For more details about our privacy practices, including our role, the specific Stripe entity responsible under this Policy, and our legal bases for processing your Personal Data, please visit our
Privacy Center
.
Defined Terms
In this Policy, “Stripe”, “we”, “our,” or “us” refers to the Stripe entity responsible for the collection, use, and handling of Personal Data as described in this document. Depending on your jurisdiction, the specific Stripe entity accountable for your Personal Data might vary.
Learn More
.
“Personal Data” refers to any information associated with an identified or identifiable individual, which can include data that you provide to us, and that we collect about you during your interaction with our Services (such as device information, IP address, etc.).
“Services” refers to the products, services, devices, and applications, that we provide under the Stripe Services Agreement (“Business Services”) or the Stripe Consumer Terms of Service (“End User Services”); websites (“Sites”) like Stripe.com and Link.com; and other Stripe applications and online services. We provide Business Services to entities (“Business Users”). We provide End User Services directly to individuals for their personal use.
“Financial Partners” are financial institutions, banks, and other partners such as payment method acquirers, payout providers, and card networks that we partner with to provide the Services.
Depending on the context, “you” might be an End Customer, End User, Representative, or Visitor:
End Users.
When you use an End User Service, such as saving a payment method with Link, for personal use we refer to you as an “End User.”
End Customers.
When you are not directly transacting with Stripe, but we receive your Personal Data to provide Services to a Business User, including when you make a purchase from a Business User on a Stripe Checkout page or receive payments from a Business User, we refer to you as an “End Customer.”
Representatives.
When you are acting on behalf of an existing or potential Business User—perhaps as a company founder, account administrator for a Business User, or a recipient of an employee credit card from a Business User via Stripe Issuing—we refer to you as a “Representative.”
Visitors.
When you interact with Stripe by visiting a Site without being logged into a Stripe account, or when your interaction with Stripe does not involve you being an End User, End Customer, or Representative, we refer to you as a “Visitor.” For example, you are a Visitor when you send a message to Stripe asking for more information about our Services.
In this Policy, “Transaction Data” refers to data collected and used by Stripe to facilitate transactions you request. Some Transaction Data is Personal Data and may include: your name, email address, contact number, billing and shipping address, payment method information (like credit or debit card number, bank account details, or payment card image chosen by you), merchant and location details, amount and date of purchase, and in some instances, information about what was purchased.
1. Personal Data that we collect and how we use and share it
2. More ways we collect, use and share Personal Data
3. Legal bases for processing data
4. Your rights and choices
5. Security and retention
6. International data transfers
7. Updates and notifications
8. Jurisdiction-specific provisions
9. Contact us
10. US Consumer Privacy Notice
1. Personal Data we collect and how we use and share it
Our collection and use of Personal Data differs based on whether you are an End User, End Customer, Representative, or Visitor, and the specific Service that you are using. For example, if you're a sole proprietor who wants to use our Business Services, we may collect your Personal Data to onboard your business; at the same time, you might also be an End Customer if you've bought goods from another Business User that is using our Services for payment processing. You could also be an End User if you used our End User Service, such as Link, for those transactions.
1.1 End Users
We provide End User Services when we provide the Services directly to you for your personal use (e.g., Link). Additional details regarding our collection, usage, and sharing of End User Personal Data, including the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such data, can be found in our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about End Users
Using Link or Connecting your bank account
. Stripe offers a service called "Link," which allows you to create an account and store information for future interactions with Stripe’s Services and Business Users. You may save a number of different kinds of Personal Data using Link. For instance, you may save your name, payment method details, contact information, and address to conveniently use saved information to pay for transactions across our Business Users. When you choose to pay with Link, we will also collect Transaction Data associated with your transactions.
Learn More
.
You can also share and save bank account details to your Link account using Stripe’s
Financial Connections
product. When you use Financial Connections, Stripe will periodically collect and process your account information (such as bank account owner information, account balances, account number and details, account transactions, and, in some cases, log-in credentials). You can ask us to cease the collection of such data at any time.
Learn More
.
Finally, you can use Link to store your identity documents (such as your driver’s license) so that you can share them in future interactions with Stripe or its Business Users.
Paying Stripe
. When you purchase goods or services directly from Stripe, we receive your Transaction Data. For instance, when you make a payment to Stripe Climate, we collect information about the transaction, as well as your contact and payment method details.
Identity/Verification Services
. We offer an identity verification service that automates the comparison of your identity document (such as a driver’s license) with your image (such as a selfie). You can separately consent to us using your biometric data to enhance our verification technology, with the option to revoke your consent at any time.
Learn More
.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about End Users, including about your online activity and your engagement with our End User Services, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of End Users
Services
. We use and share your Personal Data to provide the End User Services to you, which includes support, personalization (such as language preferences and setting choices), and communication about our End User Services (such as communicating Policy updates and information about our Services). For example, Stripe may use cookies and similar technologies or the data you provide to our Business Users (such as when you input your email address on a Business User’s website) to recognize you and help you use Link when visiting our Business User’s website. Learn more about how we use cookies and similar technologies in Stripe’s
Cookie Policy
.
Our Business Users.
When you use Link to make payments with our Business Users, we share your Personal Data, including name, contact information, payment method details, and Transaction Data with those Business Users.
Learn More
. You can also direct Stripe to share your saved bank account information and identity documents with Business Users you do business with. Once we share your Personal Data with Business Users, we may process that Personal Data as a Data Processor for those Business Users, as detailed in Section 1.2 of this Policy.  You should consult the privacy policies of the Business Users’ you do business with for information on how they use the information shared with them.
Fraud Detection and Loss Prevention
. We use your Personal Data collected across our Services to detect fraud and prevent financial losses for you, us, and our Business Users and Financial Partners, including detecting unauthorized purchases. We may provide Business Users and Financial Partners, including those that use our fraud prevention-related Business Services (such as Stripe Radar), with Personal Data about you (including your attempted transactions) so that they can assess the fraud or loss risk associated with the transaction. Learn more about how we may use technology to assess the fraud risk associated with an attempted transaction and what information we share with Business Users and Financial Partners
here
and
here
.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, we may use your Personal Data, including Transaction Data, to assess your eligibility for, and offer you, other End User Services or promote existing End User Services, including through co-marketing with partners such as Stripe Business Users.
Learn more
. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we use and share End User Personal Data with third party partners to allow us to advertise our End User Services to you, including through interest-based advertising, and to track the efficacy of such ads. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment, but we may provide your data to third-party partners, such as advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services to you.
Learn more
.
More
. For further information about ways we may use and share End Users' Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.2 End Customers
Stripe provides various Business Services to our Business Users, which include processing in-person or online payments or payouts for those Business Users. When acting as a service provider—also referred to as a Data Processor—for a Business User, we process End Customer Personal Data in accordance with our agreement with the Business User and the Business User's lawful instructions. This happens, for example, when we process a payment for a Business User because you purchased a product from them, or when the Business User asks us to send you funds.
Business Users are responsible for ensuring that the privacy rights of their End Customers are respected, including obtaining appropriate consents and making disclosures about their own data collection and use associated with their products and services. If you're an End Customer, please refer to the privacy policy of the Business User you're doing business with for its privacy practices, choices, and controls.
We provide more comprehensive information about our collection, use, and sharing of End Customer Personal Data in our
Privacy Center
, including the
legal bases
we rely on for processing your Personal Data.
a. Personal Data we collect about End Customers
Transaction Data
. If you're an End Customer making payments to, receiving refunds or payments from, initiating a purchase or donation, or otherwise transacting with our Business User, whether in-person or online, we receive your Transaction Data. We may also receive your transaction history with the Business User.
Learn More
. Additionally, we may collect information entered into a checkout form even if you opt not to complete the form or transaction with the Business User.
Learn More
. A Business User who uses Stripe’s Terminal Service to provide its goods or services to End Customers may use the Terminal Service to collect End Customer Personal Data (like your name, email, phone number, address, signature, or age) in accordance with its own privacy policy.
Identity/Verification Information
. Stripe provides a verification and fraud prevention Service that our Business Users can use to verify Personal Data about you, such as your authorization to use a particular payment method. During the process, you’d be asked to share with us certain Personal Data (like your government ID and selfie for biometric verification, Personal Data you input, or Personal Data that is apparent from the physical payment method like a credit card image). To protect against fraud and determine if somebody is trying to impersonate you, we may cross-verify this data with information about you that we've collected from Business Users, Financial Partners, business affiliates, identity verification services, publicly available sources, and other third party service providers and sources.
Learn More
.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about End Customers, including about your online activity, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of End Customers
To provide our Business Services to our Business Users, we use and share End Customers' Personal Data with them. Where allowed, we also use End Customers' Personal Data for Stripe’s own purposes such as enhancing security, improving and offering our Business Services, and preventing fraud, loss, and other damages, as described further below.
Payment processing and accounting
. We use your Transaction Data to deliver Payment-related Business Services to Business Users — including online payment transactions processing, sales tax calculation, and invoice, bill, and dispute handling — and to help them determine their revenue, settle their bills, and execute accounting tasks.
Learn More
. We may also use your Personal Data to provide and improve our Business Services.
During payment transactions, your Personal Data is shared with various entities in connection with your transaction. As a service provider or data processor, we share Personal Data to enable transactions as directed by Business Users. For instance, when you choose a payment method for your transaction, we may share your Transaction Data with your bank or other payment method provider, including as necessary to authenticate you, Learn More, process your transaction, prevent fraud, and handle disputes. The Business User you choose to do business with also receives Transaction Data and might share the data with others. Please review your merchant’s, bank’s, and payment method provider’s privacy policies for more information about how they use and share your Personal Data.
Financial services
. Certain Business Users leverage our Services to offer financial services to you via Stripe or our Financial Partners. For example, a Business User may issue a card product with which you can purchase goods and services. Such cards could carry the brand of Stripe, the bank partner, and/or the Business User. In addition to any Transaction Data we may generate or receive when these cards are used for purchases, we also collect and use your Personal Data to provide and manage these products, including assisting our Business Users in preventing misuse of the cards. Please review the privacy policies of the Business User and, if applicable, our bank partners associated with the financial service (the brands of which may be shown on the card) for more information.
Identity/Verification services
. We use Personal Data about your identity to perform verification services for Stripe or for the Business Users that you are transacting with, to prevent fraud, and to enhance security. For these purposes we may use Personal Data you provide directly or Personal Data we obtain from our service providers, including for phone verification.
Learn More
. If you provide a selfie along with an image of your identity document, we may employ biometric technology to compare and calculate whether they match and verify your identity.
Learn More
.
Fraud detection and loss prevention.
We use your Personal Data collected across our Services to detect and prevent losses for you, us, our Business Users, and Financial Partners. We may provide Business Users and Financial Partners, including those using our fraud prevention-related Business Services, with your Personal Data (including your attempted transactions) to help them assess the fraud or loss risk associated with a transaction. Learn more about how we may use technology to assess the fraud risk associated with an attempted transaction and what information we share with Business Users and Financial Partners
here
and
here
.
Our Business Users (and their authorized third parties).
We share End Customers' Personal Data with their respective Business Users and parties directly authorized by those Business Users to receive such data. Here are common examples of such sharing:
When a Business User instructs Stripe to provide another Business User with access to its Stripe account, including data related to its End Customers, via Stripe Connect.
Sharing information that you have provided to us with a Business User so that we can send payments to you on behalf of that Business User.
Sharing information, documents, or images provided by an End Customer with a Business User when the latter uses Stripe Identity, our identity verification Service, to verify the identity of the End Customer.
The Business Users you choose to do business with may further share your Personal Data with third parties (like additional third party service providers other than Stripe). Please review the Business User’s privacy policy for more information.
Advertising by Business Users
. If you initiate a purchasing process with a Business User, the Business User receives your Personal Data from us in connection with our provision of Services even if you don't finish your purchase. The Business User may use your Personal Data to market and advertise their products or services, subject to the terms of their privacy policy. Please review the Business User’s privacy policy for more information, including your rights to stop their use of your Personal Data for marketing purposes.
More
. For further information about additional ways by which we may use and share End Customers' Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.3 Representatives
We collect, use, and share Personal Data from Representatives of Business Users (for example, business owners) to provide our Business Services. For more information about how we collect, use, and share Personal Data from Representatives, as well as the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such Personal Data, please visit our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about Representatives
Registration and contact information
. When you register for a Stripe account for a Business User (including incorporation of a Business), we collect your name and login credentials. If you register for or attend an event organized by Stripe or sign up to receive Stripe communications, we collect your registration and profile data. As a Representative, we may collect your Personal Data from third parties, including data providers, to advertise, market, and communicate with you as detailed further in the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below. We may also link a location with you to tailor the Services or information effectively to your needs.
Learn More
.
Identification Information
. As a current or potential Business User, an owner of a Business User, or a shareholder, officer, or director of a Business User, we need your contact details, such as name, postal address, telephone number, and email address, to fulfill our Financial Partner and regulatory requirements, verify your identity, and prevent fraudulent activities and harm to the Stripe platform. We collect your Personal Data, such as ownership interest in the Business User, date of birth, government-issued identity documents, and associated identifiers, as well as any history of fraud or misuse, directly from you and/or from publicly available sources, third parties such as credit bureaus and via the Services we provide.
Learn More
. You may also choose to provide us with bank account information.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about Representatives, including your online activity, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of Representatives
We typically use the Personal Data of Representatives to provide the Business Services to the corresponding Business Users. The ways we use and share this data are further described below.
Business Services
. We use and share Representatives’ Personal Data with Business Users to provide the Services requested by you or the Business User you represent.
In some instances, we may have to submit your Personal Data to a government entity to provide our Business Services, for purposes such as the incorporation of a business, or calculating and paying applicable sales tax. For our tax-related Business Services, we may use your Personal Data to prepare tax documents and file taxes on behalf of the Business User you represent. For our Atlas business incorporation Services, we may use your Personal Data to submit forms to the IRS on your behalf and file documents with other government authorities, such as articles of incorporation in your state of incorporation.
We share Representatives’ Personal Data with parties authorized by the corresponding Business User, such as Financial Partners servicing a financial product, or third party apps or services the Business User chooses to use alongside our Business Services. Here are common examples of such sharing:
Payment method providers, like Visa or WeChat Pay, require information about Business Users and their Representatives who accept their payment methods. This information is typically required during the onboarding process or for processing transactions and handling disputes for these Business Users.
Learn More
.
A Business User may authorize Stripe to share your Personal Data with other Business Users to facilitate the provision of Services through Stripe Connect.
The use of Personal Data by a third party authorized by a Business User is subject to the third party’s privacy policy.
If you are a Business User who has chosen a name that includes Personal Data (for example, a sole proprietorship or family name in a company name), we will use and share such information for the provision of our Services in the same way we do with any company name. This may include, for example, displaying it on receipts and other transaction-identifying descriptions.
Fraud detection and loss prevention
. We use Representatives’ Personal Data to identify and manage risks that our Business Services might be used for fraudulent activities causing losses to Stripe, End Users, End Customers, Business Users, Financial Partners, and others. We also use information about you obtained from publicly available sources, third parties like credit bureaus and from our Services to address such risks, including to identify patterns of misuse and monitor for terms of service violations. Stripe may share Representatives' Personal Data with Business Users, our Financial Partners, and third party service providers, including phone verification providers,
Learn More
, to verify the information provided by you and identify risk indicators.
Learn More
. We also use and share Representatives' Personal Data to conduct due diligence, including conducting anti-money laundering and sanctions screening in accordance with applicable law.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, and where required with your consent, we use and share Representatives’ Personal Data with third parties, including
Partners
, so we can advertise and market our Services and Partner integrations. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we may advertise through interest-based advertising and track the efficacy of such ads. See our
Cookie Policy
. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment. However, we may provide your data to third party partners, like advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services.
Learn more
. We may also use your Personal Data, including your Stripe account activity, to evaluate your eligibility for and offer you Business Services or promote existing Business Services.
Learn more
.
More
. For further information about additional ways by which we may use and share Representatives’ Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.4 Visitors
We collect, use, and share the Personal Data of Visitors. More details about how we collect, use, and share Visitors’ Personal Data, along with the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such Personal Data, can be found in our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about Visitors
When you browse our Sites, we receive your Personal Data, either provided directly by you or collected through our use of cookies and similar technologies. See our
Cookie Policy
for more information. If you opt to complete a form on the Site or third party websites where our advertisements are displayed (like LinkedIn or Facebook), we collect the information you included in the form. This may include your contact information and other information pertaining to your questions about our Services. We may also associate a location with your visit.
Learn More
.
More
. Further details about other types of Personal Data that we may collect from Visitors, including your online activity, can be found in the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of Visitors
Personalization
. We use the data we collect about you using cookies and similar technologies to measure engagement with the content on the Sites, improve relevancy and navigation, customize your experience (such as language preference and region-specific content), and curate content about Stripe and our Services that's tailored to you. For instance, as not all of our Services are available globally, we may customize our responses based on your region.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, and where required with your consent, we use and share Visitors’ Personal Data with third parties, including
Partners
, so we can advertise and market our Services and Partner integrations. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we may advertise through interest-based advertising and track the efficacy of such ads. See our
Cookie Policy
. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment, but we may provide your data to third party partners, like advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services.
Learn more
.
Engagement
. As you interact with our Sites, we use the information we collect about and through your devices to provide opportunities for further interactions, such as discussions about Services or interactions with chatbots, to address your questions.
More
. For more information about additional ways we may use and share Visitors’ Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
2. More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
In addition to the ways described above, we also process your Personal Data as follows:
a. Collection of Personal Data
Online Activity
. Depending on the Service used and how our Business Services are implemented by the Business Users, we may collect information related to:
The devices and browsers you use across our Sites and third party websites, apps, and other online services (“Third Party Sites”).
Usage data associated with those devices and browsers and your engagement with our Services, including data elements like IP address, plug-ins, language preference, time spent on Sites and Third Party Sites, pages visited, links clicked, payment methods used, and the pages that led you to our Sites and Third Party Sites. We also collect activity indicators, such as mouse activity indicators, to help us detect fraud.
Learn More
. See also our
Cookie Policy
.
Communication and Engagement Information
. We also collect information you choose to share with us through various channels, such as support tickets, emails, or social media. If you respond to emails or surveys from Stripe, we collect your email address, name, and any other data you opt to include in your email or responses. If you engage with us over the phone, we collect your phone number and any other information you might provide during the call. Calls with Stripe or Stripe representatives may be recorded.
Learn More
. Additionally, we collect your engagement data, like your registration for, attendance at, or viewing of Stripe events and any other interactions with Stripe personnel.
Forums and Discussion Groups
. If our Sites allow posting of content, we collect Personal Data that you provide in connection with the post.
b. Use of Personal Data.
Besides the use of Personal Data described above, we use Personal Data in the ways listed below:
Analyzing, Improving, and Developing our Services
. We collect and process Personal Data throughout our various Services, whether you are an End User, End Customer, Representative, or Visitor, to improve our Services, develop new Services, and support our efforts to make our Services more efficient, relevant, and useful to you.
Learn More
.  We may use Personal Data to generate aggregate and statistical information to understand and explain how our Services are used.  Examples of how we use Personal Data to analyze, improve, and develop our products and services include:
Using analytics on our Sites, including as described in our Cookie Policy, to help us understand your use of our Sites and Services and diagnose technical issues.
Training machine learning models to power our Services and protect against fraud and other harm.
Learn more
.
Analyzing and drawing inferences from Transaction Data to reduce costs, fraud, and disputes and increase authentication and authorization rates for Stripe and our Business Users.
Communications
. We use the contact information we have about you to deliver our Services,
Learn More
, which may involve sending codes via SMS for your authentication.
Learn More
. If you are an End User, Representative, or Visitor, we may communicate with you using the contact information we have about you to provide information about our Services and our affiliates’ services, invite you to participate in our events, surveys, or user research, or otherwise communicate with you for marketing purposes, in compliance with applicable law, including any consent or opt-out requirements. For example, when you provide your contact information to us or when we collect your business contact details through participation at trade shows or other events, we may use this data to follow up with you regarding an event, provide information requested about our Services, and include you in our marketing information campaigns. Where permitted under applicable law, we may record our calls with you to provide our Services, comply with our legal obligations, perform research and quality assurance, and for training purposes.
Social Media and Promotions
. If you opt to submit Personal Data to engage in an offer, program, or promotion, we use the Personal Data you provide to manage the offer, program, or promotion. We also use the Personal Data you provide, along with the Personal Data you make available on social media platforms, for marketing purposes, unless we are not permitted to do so.
Fraud Prevention and Security
. We collect and use Personal Data to help us identify and manage activities that could be fraudulent or harmful across our Services, enable our fraud detection Business Services, and secure our Services and transactions against unauthorized access, use, alteration or misappropriation of Personal Data, information, and funds. As part of the fraud prevention, detection, security monitoring, and compliance efforts for Stripe and its Business Users, we collect information from publicly available sources, third parties (such as credit bureaus), and via the Services we offer. In some instances, we may also collect information about you directly from you, or from our Business Users, Financial Partners, and other third parties for the same purposes. Furthermore, to protect our Services, we may receive details such as IP addresses and other identifying data about potential security threats from third parties.
Learn More
. Such information helps us verify identities, conduct credit checks where lawfully permitted, and prevent fraud. Additionally, we might use technology to evaluate the potential risk of fraud associated with individuals seeking to procure our Business Services or arising from attempted transactions by an End Customer or End User with our Business Users or Financial Partners.
Compliance with Legal Obligations
. We use Personal Data to meet our contractual and legal obligations related to anti-money laundering, Know-Your-Customer ("KYC") laws, anti-terrorism activities, safeguarding vulnerable customers, export control, and prohibition of doing business with restricted persons or in certain business fields, among other legal obligations. For example, we may monitor transaction patterns and other online signals and use those insights to identify fraud, money laundering, and other harmful activity that could affect Stripe, our Financial Partners, End Users, Business Users and others.
Learn More
. Safety, security, and compliance for our Services are key priorities for us, and collecting and using Personal Data is crucial to this effort.
Minors
. Our Services are not directed to children under the age of 13, and we request that they do not provide Personal Data to seek Services directly from Stripe. In certain jurisdictions, we may impose higher age limits as required by applicable law.
c. Sharing of Personal Data.
Besides the sharing of Personal Data described above, we share Personal Data in the ways listed below:
Stripe Affiliates
. We share Personal Data with other Stripe-affiliated entities for purposes identified in this Policy.
Service Providers or Processors
. In order to provide, communicate, market, analyze, and advertise our Services, we depend on service providers. These providers offer critical services such as providing cloud infrastructure, conducting analytics for the assessment of the speed, accuracy, and/or security of our Services, verifying identities, identifying potentially harmful activity, and providing customer service and audit functions. We authorize these service providers to use or disclose the Personal Data we make available to them to perform services on our behalf and to comply with relevant legal obligations. We require these service providers to contractually commit to security and confidentiality obligations for the Personal Data they process on our behalf. The majority of our service providers are based in the European Union, the United States of America, and India.
Learn More
.
Financial Partners
. We share Personal Data with certain Financial Partners to provide Services to Business Users and offer certain Services in conjunction with these Financial Partners. For instance, we may share certain Personal Data, such as payment processing volume, loan repayment data, and Representative contact information, with institutional investors and lenders who purchase loan receivables or provide financing related to Stripe Capital.
Learn More
.
Others with Consent
. In some situations, we may not offer a service, but instead refer you to others (like professional service firms that we partner with to deliver the Atlas Service). In these instances, we will disclose the identity of the third party and the information to be shared with them, and seek your consent to share the information.
Corporate Transactions
. If we enter or intend to enter a transaction that modifies the structure of our business, such as a reorganization, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer, change of control, or other disposition of all or part of our business, assets, or stock, we may share Personal Data with third parties in connection with such transaction. Any other entity that buys us or part of our business will have the right to continue to use your Personal Data, subject to the terms of this Policy.
Compliance and Harm Prevention
. We share Personal Data when we believe it is necessary to comply with applicable law; to abide by rules imposed by Financial Partners in connection with the use of their payment method; to enforce our contractual rights; to secure and protect the Services, rights, privacy, safety, and property of Stripe, you, and others, including against malicious or fraudulent activity; and to respond to valid legal requests from courts, law enforcement agencies, regulatory agencies, and other public and government authorities, which may include authorities outside your country of residence.
3. Legal bases for processing Personal Data
For purposes of the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) and other applicable data protection laws, we rely on a number of legal bases to process your Personal Data.
Learn More
. For some jurisdictions, there may be additional legal bases, which are outlined in the
Jurisdiction-Specific Provisions
section below.
a. Contractual and Pre-Contractual Business Relationships
. We process Personal Data to enter into business relationships with prospective Business Users and End Users and fulfill our respective contractual obligations with them. These processing activities include:
Creation and management of Stripe accounts and Stripe account credentials, including the assessment of applications to initiate or expand the use of our Services;
Creation and management of Stripe Checkout accounts;
Accounting, auditing, and billing activities; and
Processing of payments and related activities, which include fraud detection, loss prevention, transaction optimization, communications about such payments, and related customer service activities.
b. Legal Compliance
. We process Personal Data to verify the identities of individuals and entities to comply with obligations related to fraud monitoring, prevention, and detection, laws associated with identifying and reporting illicit and illegal activities, such as those under the Anti-Money Laundering ("AML") and Know-Your-Customer (“KYC") regulations, and financial reporting obligations. For example, we may be required to record and verify a Business User’s identity to comply with regulations designed to prevent money laundering, fraud, and financial crimes. These legal obligations may require us to report our compliance to third parties and subject ourselves to third party verification audits.
c. Legitimate Interests
. Where permitted under applicable law, we rely on our legitimate business interests to process your Personal Data. The following list provides an example of the business purposes for which we have a legitimate interest in processing your data:
Detection, monitoring, and prevention of fraud and unauthorized payment transactions;
Mitigation of financial loss, claims, liabilities or other harm to End Customers, End Users, Business Users, Financial Partners, and Stripe;
Determination of eligibility for and offering new Stripe Services (
Learn More
);
Response to inquiries, delivery of Service notices, and provision of customer support;
Promotion, analysis, modification, and improvement of our Services, systems, and tools, as well as the development of new products and services, including enhancing the reliability of the Services;
Management, operation, and improvement of the performance of our Sites and Services, through understanding their effectiveness and optimizing our digital assets;
Analysis and advertisement of our Services, and related improvements;
Aggregate analysis and development of business intelligence that enable us to operate, protect, make informed decisions about, and report on the performance of our business;
Sharing of Personal Data with third party service providers that offer services on our behalf and business partners that help us in operating and improving our business (
Learn More)
;
Enabling network and information security throughout Stripe and our Services; and
Sharing of Personal Data among our affiliates.
d. Consent
. We may rely on consent or explicit consent to collect and process Personal Data regarding our interactions with you and the provision of our Services such as Link, Financial Connections, Atlas, and Identity. When we process your Personal Data based on your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time, and such a withdrawal will not impact the legality of processing performed based on the consent prior to its withdrawal.
e. Substantial Public Interest
. We may process special categories of Personal Data, as defined by the GDPR, when such processing is necessary for reasons of substantial public interest and consistent with applicable law, such as when we conduct politically-exposed person checks. We may also process Personal Data related to criminal convictions and offenses when such processing is authorized by applicable law, such as when we conduct sanctions screening to comply with AML and KYC obligations.
f. Other valid legal bases
. We may process Personal Data further to other valid legal bases as recognized under applicable law in specific jurisdictions. See the Jurisdiction-specific provisions section below for more information.
4. Your rights and choices
Depending on your location and subject to applicable law, you may have choices regarding our collection, use, and disclosure of your Personal Data:
a. Opting out of receiving electronic communications from us
If you wish to stop receiving marketing-related emails from us, you can opt-out by clicking the unsubscribe link included in such emails or as described
here
. We'll try to process your request(s) as quickly as reasonably practicable. However, it's important to note that even if you opt out of receiving marketing-related emails from us, we retain the right to communicate with you about the Services you receive (like support and important legal notices) and our Business Users might still send you messages or instruct us to send you messages on their behalf.
b. Your data protection rights
Depending on your location and subject to applicable law, you may have the following rights regarding the Personal Data we process about you as a data controller:
The right to request confirmation of whether Stripe is processing Personal Data associated with you, the categories of personal data it has processed, and the third parties or categories of third parties with which your Personal Data is shared;
The right to request access to the Personal Data Stripe processes about you (
Learn More
);
The right to request that Stripe rectify or update your Personal Data if it's inaccurate, incomplete, or outdated;
The right to request that Stripe erase your Personal Data in certain circumstances as provided by law (
Learn More
);
The right to request that Stripe restrict the use of your Personal Data in certain circumstances, such as while Stripe is considering another request you've submitted (for instance, a request that Stripe update your Personal Data);
The right to request that we export the Personal Data we hold about you to another company, provided it's technically feasible;
The right to withdraw your consent if your Personal Data is being processed based on your previous consent;
The right to object to the processing of your Personal Data if we are processing your data based on our legitimate interests; unless there are compelling legitimate grounds or the processing is necessary for legal reasons, we will cease processing your Personal Data upon receiving your objection (
Learn More
);
The right not to be discriminated against for exercising these rights; and
The right to appeal any decision by Stripe relating to your rights by contacting Stripe’s Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) at
dpo@stripe.com
, and/or relevant regulatory agencies.
You may have additional rights, depending on applicable law, over your Personal Data. For example, see the Jurisdiction-specific provisions section under United States below.
c. Process for exercising your data protection rights
To exercise your data protection rights related to Personal Data we process as a data controller, visit our
Privacy Center
or contact us as outlined below.  For Personal Data we process as a data processor, please reach out to the relevant data controller (Business User) to exercise your rights. If you contact us regarding your Personal Data we process as a data processor, we will refer you to the relevant data controller to the extent we are able to identify them.
5. Security and Retention
We make reasonable efforts to provide a level of security appropriate to the risk associated with the processing of your Personal Data. We maintain organizational, technical, and administrative measures designed to protect the Personal Data covered by this Policy from unauthorized access, destruction, loss, alteration, or misuse.
Learn More
. Unfortunately, no data transmission or storage system can be guaranteed to be 100% secure.
We encourage you to assist us in protecting your Personal Data. If you hold a Stripe account, you can do so by using a strong password, safeguarding your password against unauthorized use, and avoiding using identical login credentials you use for other services or accounts for your Stripe account. If you suspect that your interaction with us is no longer secure (for instance, you believe that your Stripe account's security has been compromised), please
contact us
immediately.
We retain your Personal Data for as long as we continue to provide the Services to you or our Business Users, or for a period in which we reasonably foresee continuing to provide the Services. Even after we stop providing Services directly to you or to a Business User that you're doing business with, and even after you close your Stripe account or complete a transaction with a Business User, we may continue to retain your Personal Data to:
Comply with our legal and regulatory obligations;
Enable fraud monitoring, detection, and prevention activities; and
Comply with our tax, accounting, and financial reporting obligations, including when such retention is required by our contractual agreements with our Financial Partners (and where data retention is mandated by the payment methods you've used).
In cases where we keep your Personal Data, we do so in accordance with any limitation periods and record retention obligations imposed by applicable law.
Learn More
.
6. International Data Transfers
As a global business, it's sometimes necessary for us to transfer your Personal Data to countries other than your own, including the United States. These countries might have data protection regulations that are different from those in your country. When transferring data across borders, we take measures to comply with applicable data protection laws related to such transfer. In certain situations, we may be required to disclose Personal Data in response to lawful requests from officials, such as law enforcement or security authorities.
Learn More
.
If you are located in the European Economic Area (“EEA”), the United Kingdom ("UK"), or Switzerland, please refer to our
Privacy Center
for additional details. When a data transfer mechanism is mandated by applicable law, we employ one or more of the following:
Transfers to certain countries or recipients that are recognized as having an adequate level of protection for Personal Data under applicable law.
EU Standard Contractual Clauses approved by the European Commission and the UK International Data Transfer Addendum issued by the Information Commissioner’s Office. You can obtain a copy of the relevant Standard Contractual Clauses.
Learn More
.
Other lawful methods available to us under applicable law.
Stripe, Inc. complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce and as applicable.
Learn More
.
Stripe’s privacy practices, as described in this Privacy Policy, comply with the Cross Border Privacy Rules System (“CBPR”) and Privacy Rules for Processor (“PRP”) systems. These systems provide a framework for organizations to ensure protection of personal data transferred among participating economies. Where CBPR and/or PRP are recognized as a valid transfer mechanism under applicable law, Stripe will transfer Personal Data in accordance with the CBPR and PRP certifications Stripe has obtained. More information about the framework can be found
here
and
here
. If you have unresolved privacy or data use concerns that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S. based third-party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
. To view the status of our certifications, please click
here
(CBPR) and
here
(PRP).
7. Updates and notifications
We may change this Policy from time to time to reflect new services, changes in our privacy practices or relevant laws. The “Last updated” legend at the top of this Policy indicates when this Policy was last materially revised. Any changes are effective the latter of when we post the revised Policy on the Services or otherwise provide notice of the update as required by law.
We may provide you with disclosures and alerts regarding the Policy or Personal Data collected by posting them on our website and, if you are an End User or Representative, by contacting you through your Stripe Dashboard, email address and/or the physical address listed in your Stripe account.
8. Jurisdiction-specific provisions
Australia
. “Personal Data” includes “personal information” as defined under applicable privacy laws in Australia, including the Privacy Act 1988 (Cth) as amended from time to time.
If we use personal information to make automated decisions that could reasonably be expected to significantly affect your rights or interests, we will provide the legally required information and transparency via our
Privacy Center
, and/or on a case by case basis.
If you are an Australian resident and dissatisfied with our handling of any complaint you raise under this Policy, you may consider contacting the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner.
Brazil
. You may exercise your rights by contacting our DPO Adi Gilad at dpo@stripe.com. Brazilian residents, for whom the Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (“LGPD”) applies, have rights set forth in Article 18 of the LGPD.
Canada
. As used in this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Federal Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act (“PIPEDA”), the Personal Information Protection Act, SBC 2003 c 63, in British Columbia, the Personal Information Protection Act, SA 2003 c P-6.5, in Alberta, and the Act Respecting the Protection of Personal Information in the Private Sector, CQLR c P-39-1 (“Quebec Private Sector Act”), in Quebec.
Learn more.
“Personal Data” includes “personal information” as defined under those laws.
Stripe’s Chief Privacy Officer is the person in charge of personal information, including under the Quebec Private Sector Act.  You may contact them via email at privacy@stripe.com.  When Stripe collects Personal Data belonging to Canadian (including Quebec) residents, it transfers that data to data centers in the United States.  When Stripe relies on service providers to process Personal Data as described herein, those service providers may also be located outside of Canada or Quebec.
You have the right to request access or rectification of the Personal Data Stripe holds related to you or to withdraw any consent given to the processing of such personal data.  You may exercise those rights by contacting Stripe’s Chief Privacy Officer at privacy@stripe.com.  If you are an End Customer, you should contact the Business User with which you transacted to exercise your rights.
EEA and UK
. You may exercise your rights by contacting our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. If you are a resident of the EEA or the Stripe entity accountable for your Personal data is otherwise subject to the GDPR, and you believe our processing of your information contradicts the GDPR, you may direct your questions or complaints to the Irish Data Protection Commission. If you are a resident of the UK, direct your questions or concerns to the UK Information Commissioner’s Office. You also have additional rights under the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.
Learn More
.
India
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Digital Personal Data Protection Act (“DPDPA”) once the DPDPA enters into effect. Further, the term “data controller” includes “data fiduciaries,” and the term “data subject” includes “data principal,” both as defined in the DPDPA.
In some cases, and as permitted under the DPDPA, we may rely on “legitimate use” as a legal basis. For example, we might do so when you voluntarily provide your Personal Data to us. Where we are required to obtain your explicit and informed consent, we will do so on a case by case basis. “Consent Managers” as defined under the DPDPA may submit a request to revoke or provide consent using the methods described in the Contact Us section below, or as set out in the following paragraph, or via other means made available by Stripe in the future. We may ask for proof of authorization and identity before processing such a request.
You have the right to contact Stripe to nominate another individual, who may, in the event of your death or incapacity, exercise your rights under this Privacy Policy and under the DPDPA and implementing regulations.
In certain cases, you may be asked to consent to the collection and processing of your Aadhaar number by Stripe India Private Limited and/or its third party verification partner(s). The purpose of this collection is to facilitate the identification verification process as required under applicable laws. Your provision of Aadhaar details is purely voluntary, and you may provide other identification documents as may be accepted by us from time to time. You will not be denied service merely for not submitting Aadhaar details.
If you have any questions or complaints regarding the processing of your Personal Data in India, or if you want to receive this Policy or communicate with us about privacy in one of India’s official languages, please
contact our Nodal and Grievance Officer
.
Learn More
. Alternatively, you may contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. If we are unable to address your complaint or grievance, you have the right to escalate the matter to the Data Protection Board of India.
Indonesia
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes Law No. 11 of 2008 as amended by Law No. 19 of 2016 on Electronic Information and Transactions, Government Regulation No. 71 of 2019 on the Implementation of Electronic Systems and Transactions, and Minister of Communication and Informatics Regulation No. 20 of 2016 on Personal Data Protection in Electronic Systems, and from September 2024, Law No. 27 of 2022 concerning Personal Data Protection (“PDP Law”). If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Japan
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Act on the Protection of Personal Information (“APPI”). When we transfer Personal Data of data subjects in Japan to jurisdictions not recognized as ‘adequate’ by the Personal Information Protection Commission, we enter into written agreements with any third parties located outside of Japan. These written agreements provide rights and obligations equivalent to those provided under the Japanese Act on the Protection of Personal Information. For more information on how we ensure that third parties protect your data and where your data is located, please see above or contact us as described below. For a description of foreign systems and frameworks that may affect the implementation of equivalent measures by the third party, see
here
. In some cases, and as permitted under the APPI, we may rely on “public interest” as a legal basis, such as fraud detection and loss prevention.
Malaysia
. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Singapore
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Personal Data Protection Act 2012 (“PDPA”) (No. 26 of 2012) as amended from time to time. In some cases, and as permitted under the PDPA, we may rely on “deemed consent” as a legal basis. For example, we do so when you voluntarily provide your personal data to us. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Switzerland
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Swiss Federal Act on Data Protection (“FADP”), as revised. To exercise your rights under the FADP, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. You may also have additional rights under the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework.
Learn More
.
Thailand
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Personal Data Protection Act 2019 (“PDPA”). If we rely on certain legal bases (such as “legal obligation” or “contractual necessity” and you do not provide us with your Personal Data, we may not be able to lawfully provide you services. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at
dpo@stripe.com
. Where required, we have put in place appropriate safeguards for the cross-border transfer of Personal Data from Thailand, including the EU Standard Contractual Clauses as adapted for Thailand data transfers in accordance with the Notification of the Personal Data Protection Committee on Criteria for the Protection of Personal Data Sent or Transferred to a Foreign Country Pursuant to Section 29 of the Personal Data Protection Act, B.E. 2562 B.E. 2566 (2023).
United States
. If you are a consumer located in the United States (“US”), we process your personal information in accordance with US federal and state privacy laws. For additional  details, please review the information below and see our additional U.S. Privacy Disclosures
here
. Stripe uses cookies, including advertising cookies, as described in our
Cookie Policy
.
Your Rights and Choices
. As a US consumer and subject to certain limitations under US privacy laws, you may have choices regarding our use and disclosure of your Personal Data.  In addition to the
above rights
, you may also have the rights listed in this section. Please see our Privacy Center to
learn more
about data subject rights metrics and
learn more
about the laws under which these rights may apply.
Exercising the right to know: You have a right to request additional information about the categories of personal information collected, sold, disclosed, or shared; purposes for which this personal information was collected, sold, or shared; categories of sources of personal information; and categories of third parties with whom we disclosed or shared this personal information.
Exercising the right to opt-out from a sale or sharing: We do not transfer your personal data to third parties in exchange for payment. However, as noted above, we may provide the data to third party partners, such as advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our products and Services to you. Because these third parties may use the data Stripe provides for their own purposes, Stripe's provision of data to these parties may be considered a data “sale” or “sharing” (for behavioral advertising) as those terms are defined under the CCPA and other applicable US privacy laws. You can opt out of targeted advertising and any related data “sales” or “sharing” (for behavioral advertising)
here
.
Exercising the right to limit the use or sharing of Sensitive Personal Information: We do not sell or share (for behavioral advertising) Sensitive Personal Information as defined by US privacy laws and have not done so in the past 12 months. Learn more about our collection and use of Sensitive Personal Information over the last 12 months
here
.
Profiling with legal or similarly significant effects
: In the event that we engage in profiling or automated decision making for which applicable law entitles you to an opt out we will provide you with notice of how to exercise that opt-out right.
Appeal
: If you wish to appeal any of our decisions regarding a rights request under US privacy laws, you may do so by contacting Stripe’s Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) at
dpo@stripe.com
.
To submit a request to exercise any of the rights described above, please contact us using the methods described in the Contact Us section below. Please note that rights under some U.S. state laws do not apply to Personal Data we collect, process, and disclose when you act as a consumer to obtain financial products or services from Stripe for personal, family, or household purposes. The federal Gramm-Leach Bliley Act may govern how Stripe shares and protects that data instead. See our
US Consumer Privacy Notice
below for more information.
We will verify your request by asking you to send it from the email address associated with your account or requiring you to provide information necessary to verify your identity, including name, address, transaction history, photo identification, and other information associated with your account.
You may designate, in writing or through a power of attorney, an authorized agent to make requests on your behalf to exercise your rights under the CCPA and other applicable US privacy laws. Your agent may submit a request on your behalf by contacting us using the methods described in the Contact Us section below. We may still require you to directly verify your identity and confirm that you gave the authorized agent permission to submit the request.
Global Privacy Control signals
. Stripe honors the Global Privacy Control (GPC) opt-out preference signals.
Learn More
.
9. Contact us
If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please
contact us
. If you are an End Customer (i.e., an individual doing business or transacting with a Business User), please refer to the privacy policy or notice of the Business User for information regarding the Business User’s privacy practices, choices and controls, or contact the Business User directly.
10. US Consumer Privacy Notice
The following Consumer Privacy Notice applies to you if you are an individual who resides in the United States and obtains financial services from Stripe primarily for your own personal, family, or household purposes.
Last updated: January 16, 2025
FACTS
WHAT DOES STRIPE DO WITH YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION?
Why?
Financial companies choose how they share your personal information.  Federal law gives consumers the right to limit some but not all sharing.  Federal law also requires us to tell you how we collect, share, and protect your personal information.  Please read this notice carefully to understand what we do.
What?
The types of personal information we collect and share depend on the product or service you have with us. This information can include:
• Social Security Number
• Contact details
• Account balances and transaction history
• Payment, transaction, and purchase information and history
When you are
no longer
our customer, we continue to share your information as described in this notice.
How?
All financial companies need to share customers' personal information to run their everyday business. In the section below, we list the reasons financial companies can share their customers' personal information; the reasons Stripe chooses to share; and whether you can limit this sharing.
Reasons we can share your personal information
Does Stripe Share?
Can you limit this sharing
For our everyday business purposes – such as to process your transactions, maintain your account(s), respond to court orders and legal investigations, or report to credit bureaus
Yes
No
For our marketing purposes - to offer our products and Services to you
Yes
No
For joint marketing with other financial companies
Yes
No
For our affiliates' everyday business purposes - information about your transactions and experiences
Yes
No
For our affiliates' everyday business purposes - information about your creditworthiness
No
We don’t share
For our affiliates to market to you
No
We don’t share
For nonaffiliates to market to you  (for data not collected through Financial Connections)
Yes
Yes
For nonaffiliates to market to you  (for data collected through Financial Connections)
No
We don’t share
To limit our sharing
Login to your Link account at
app.link.com/settings
and toggle off data sharing from the Messaging menu.
Please note: If you are a new customer, we can begin sharing your information 30 days from the date we sent this notice. When you are no longer our customer, we continue to share your information as described in this notice.
However, you can contact us at any time to limit our sharing.
Questions?
Contact us at privacy@stripe.com or visit us at https://support.link.com
Who we are
Who is providing this notice?
Stripe, Inc., Stripe Payments Company, and their affiliates that provide consumers services in the U.S.
What we do
How does Stripe protect my personal information?
To protect your personal information from unauthorized access, destruction, loss, alteration, or misuse we use security measures to comply with federal law.  These measures include computer safeguards and secured files and buildings.  We impose access controls along with ongoing monitoring to prevent data misuse, and we require our service providers to take similar steps to protect your information.
How does Stripe collect my personal information?
We collect your personal information, for example, when you
• open a Link account;
• ask Stripe to process a payment for goods or services;
• provide bank account information to Stripe using Financial Connections
We also collect your personal information from others, such as affiliates or other companies.
Why can’t I limit all sharing?
Federal law gives you the right to limit only
• sharing for affiliates’ everyday business purposes — information about your creditworthiness
• affiliates from using your information to market to you
• sharing for nonaffiliates to market to you.
State laws and individual companies may give you additional rights to limit sharing. See the Other Important Information section below for more information on your rights under state law.
What happens when I limit sharing for an account I hold jointly with someone else?
Your choices will apply to everyone on your account.
Definitions
Affiliates
Companies related by common ownership or control. They can be financial and nonfinancial companies.
• Our affiliates include companies operating under the Stripe name, such as Stripe Technology Europe, Ltd. and Stripe Payments UK, Ltd.
Nonaffiliates
Companies not related by common ownership or control.  They can be financial and nonfinancial companies.
• Nonaffiliates with which we share personal information include service providers that perform services or functions on our behalf, Business Users with which you choose to transact, partners with which we share data to provide you with services, and advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services to you.
Joint Marketing
A formal agreement between non-affiliated financial companies that together market financial products or services to you.
• Our joint marketing partners include financial companies we partner with to provide you with financial services.
Other important information
Vermont: If your account with us is associated with a Vermont billing address, we will not disclose information about your creditworthiness to our affiliates and will not disclose your personal information, financial information, credit report, or health information to nonaffiliated third parties to market to you, other than as permitted by Vermont law, unless you authorize us to make those disclosures.  For joint marketing, we will only disclose your name, contact information, and information about your transactions.  Additional information concerning our privacy policies can be found in our
Privacy Policy
and
Privacy Center
.
California: If your account with us is associated with a California billing address, we will not disclose Personal Data we collect about you except to the extent permitted under California law.  For instance, we may disclose your Personal Data as necessary to process transactions or provide products and services you request, at your instruction, as required for institution risk control, and to safeguard against fraud, identity theft, and unauthorized transactions.
For additional information about our privacy practices, please visit the
Stripe Privacy Center
.
Sub-policy 1
https://home.bluesnap.com/privacy-policy/:
Get the eBook: Focus on Success in 2025: How to Build Financial Resilience, Scalability & Growth.
Download today!
Dismiss message
Skip to content
Search
Search
Home
>
Legal
>
Privacy
Privacy Policy
Legal
Privacy
site Terms
COMPLAINTS & DISPUTES
Privacy policy
BlueSnap Privacy Policy v.2.7 Date: 6 February 2025
**
BlueSnap Respects Your Privacy
Click here for California & Other US State Privacy Rights
Introduction
This website and related services are owned and operated by BlueSnap a global company providing payment facilitator and payment gateway services, enabling eCommerce, marketing and payment processing, together with various subsidiaries including a European Union subsidiary BlueSnap Payment Services Ireland Limited, a UK subsidiary BlueSnap Payment Services Limited, a Canadian subsidiary BlueSnap Enterprise Canada ULC and an Australian subsidiary BlueSnap Australia Pty Limited. References to BlueSnap in this policy also include all BlueSnap subsidiaries unless otherwise stated. Additional subsidiaries may be added over time and shall be governed by the terms of this policy.
We understand that you care about how your information is used and shared when you enter it on our websites,
www.bluesnap.com
, or use BlueSnap’s payment services as a merchant or shopper, and this notice describes our privacy policy and practices.
BlueSnap respects each individual’s right to personal privacy. We will collect and use information through our website including registration forms, inquiry forms, product transaction forms, mobile and API services only in the ways disclosed in this statement.
Online payment transactions involve transfer of data across international borders, as well backing up of data at our secured data centers in the UK and USA. This means that data may be transferred, processed and stored outside the EU, the European Economic Area (EEA), UK, Switzerland and other countries. By submitting your data directly or through a third party such as a merchant you are agreeing to such transfer, processing and storage.
BlueSnap’s Certification Under the EU-US Data Privacy Framework (EU-US DPF) and the UK Extension to the EU-US DPF
BlueSnap complies with the EU-US Data Privacy Framework program (EU-US DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-US DPF, and the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework program (Swiss-US DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce.
BlueSnap has certified to the US Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-US Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-US DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-US DPF.
BlueSnap has certified to the US Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-US DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction with enforcement authority over BlueSnap’s compliance with the EU-US Data Privacy Framework (EU-US DPF) and the UK Extension to the EU-US DPF, and the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-US DPF).
To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
In compliance with the EU-US Data Privacy Framework Principles, BlueSnap commits to resolve complaints about your privacy and our collection or use of your personal information transferred to the United States pursuant to the DPF Principles. European Union, Swiss and United Kingdom individuals with DPF inquiries or complaints should first contact:
PrivacyOptions@bluesnap.com.
Tel: +1 (781) 790-5013
Mailing Address: BlueSnap Corporate HQ, 800 South St, Suite 640, Waltham, MA
BlueSnap has further committed to refer unresolved privacy complaints under the DPF Principles to an independent dispute resolution mechanism, Data Privacy Framework Services, operated by
BBBNational Programs
. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your complaint, or if your complaint is not satisfactorily addressed, please visit https://bbbprograms.org/programs/all-programs/dpf-consumers/ProcessForConsumers for more information and to file a complaint. This service is provided free of charge to you.
If your DPF complaint cannot be resolved through the above channels, under certain conditions, you may invoke binding arbitration for some residual claims not resolved by other redress mechanisms. See
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/framework-article/ANNEX-I-introduction
The DPF Principles also provide that a participating organization has responsibility for the processing of personal information it receives under the DPF Principles and subsequently transfers to a third party acting as an agent on its behalf. Accordingly BlueSnap shall remain liable under the DPF Principles if such agent processes such personal information in a manner inconsistent with the DPF Principles, unless BlueSnap can prove that it is not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
Standard Contractual Clauses
BlueSnap and its international subsidiaries are also contractually committed with respect to data transfers from the EEA, UK and Switzerland to other countries through the use of the
EU’s approved ‘Standard Contractual Clauses’ and the UK’s Standard Contractual Clauses Addendum
(“SCCs”). BlueSnap is bound by the SCCs with respect to data transfers from the EEA, Switzerland and UK to the US. BlueSnap is committed to maintaining the principles of transparency, accountability and choice regarding the collection and use of your personal information.
BlueSnap Services and You
When using BlueSnap’s services, technologies, functions, website or applications, the terms of this policy will apply.
BlueSnap acts as a technology provider supplying secure online and mobile digital payment processing services to businesses known as merchants so that they can sell their goods and services to their shoppers both domestically and worldwide.
The personal information collected by BlueSnap depends on how you are using our services.
Individuals typically interface with BlueSnap in one of the following ways:
Site Visitor:
If you are visiting our website for details about our products and services, you may be asked to enter your personal details on an online form to receive more information. Cookies may be used to track site usage to assist in product development or monitor behavior for marketing purposes. Visitors from the EU/EEA, Switzerland and UK may initially be asked to expressly consent to cookie usage. Certain interactions with Sales and Support staff may involve recording of conversations and in such situations you will have the option to accept or reject such recording.
Merchant:
you may be a business customer that has consented to BlueSnap’s terms of service under a merchant or other formal agreement and use BlueSnap to conduct secure online sales or an individual in the employ of such a party. To set up a merchant account you will need to provide personal details, business data and identifying documentation to comply with KYC and AML requirements relating to the payments industry.
Shopper:
You may be a business or consumer using BlueSnap’s secure online payment technologies to complete the purchase of goods and services from a merchant that has selected BlueSnap as its payments solution. Your own choice of payment method will usually determine what personal data is passed to BlueSnap to enable your payment transaction to take place. It could be name, address and credit/debit card details, electronic bank transfer information, or pay-wallet credentials if using a service such as PayPal, or tokenized data if using a service such as Apple Pay.
While such secure transactions may be completed in just a few seconds they are often complicated by the fact that live anti-fraud checks need to be conducted to verify that the actual card owner is generating the transaction. Data also has to be passed to the relevant payment processors; banks, payment card and payment account services may need to be notified; legal tax invoices generated, and transaction confirmations delivered; and this is dictated by the Shopper’s choice of payment method and selected merchant. Often these transactions may be international in nature, involving transfer of data across borders and continents. Some or all of these steps may all involve the transfer and sharing of personal data down a chain of service providers and third parties including merchant referrers, the storage of transaction records in accordance with regulatory or contractual requirements as well as the use of tracking cookies.
The relevant merchant, product supplier and shipping service may each need to receive personal data in order to facilitate the transaction and retain such data for their records in accordance with their own respective privacy policies. Shoppers may also have elected to pay in instalments using a ‘buy now pay later service’ that requires relevant personal data being shared with such service.
If a Shopper makes a purchase through a merchant that operates through a marketplace service this may involve some personal data being transmitted to both the marketplace and the merchant and their respective privacy policies will apply.
The Information BlueSnap Collects
The types of personal information we may obtain or you may choose to provide include:
Contact information (such as name, postal address, email address, phone number)
Business contact information, job function, title, department, name and size of organization
Username and password
Payment account data – such as credit card information
Content provided (includes social media submissions – comments, articles, ratings)
Mobile and device unique identifiers
Geo-location data
Business records and identification documents
IP address, browser type, operating system
Recording of conversations with Sales and Support
Other information (such as tracking behavior, cookie preferences, language preferences, age, date of birth, gender and family status), time stamps, device details
Some of this information may be collected automatically by using technologies such as cookies and web beacons, when you interact with advertisements, mobile applications, sales pages, website pages and other digital applications. Often shoppers will provide information themselves when interacting with merchants to purchase goods and services.
Use of Information Collected
The information is collected to perform the following functions:
Process payment transactions (including authorization, clearance, invoicing, tax calculation, currency exchange, shipping, delivery, processing refunds, chargebacks, provision of customer support and dispute resolution processes)
Generation of invoices, transaction confirmation notices, delivery of licenses, access keys, product download files and associated documentation, subscription accounts, instant notifications relating to transactions, refunds and refund notices, warranty and dispute records, customer profiles, tax payments
Communicate with you, respond to inquiries and send service notices, issue notices about functions and services you are registered to use including significant developments about the website and/or eCommerce services. (Users cannot normally op-out of this kind of email communication without cancelling the relevant service).
When BlueSnap acts as payment service provider, merchant and/or reseller for product suppliers, we may need to share relevant customer information with the specific merchant/product supplier involved in the transaction in order for them to fulfill the transaction. Such information is supplied on the condition that it will not be used for spamming or direct marketing by another party. Occasionally such product suppliers may sell, transfer or assign their business to new owners and in such circumstances data records may be accessible to the new owners subject to such parties satisfying the underwriting requirements of BlueSnap and assuming the ongoing responsibility for the proper protection of such data by committing to relevant contractual provisions.
Check applications for use of BlueSnap services, perform account underwriting and KYC reviews, protect against and prevent customer and transaction fraud, unauthorized transactions, claims, manage risk exposure, conduct periodic risk reviews and credit checks.
Evaluate business, product development, improve services, perform marketing activities, run billing, invoicing and account reconciliation functions, staff training and customer support records.
Compliance with legislation, regulations, legal requirements and law enforcement measures, orders and subpoenas from judicial and governmental authorities, enforcement and defense of contractual and legal rights and claims, generation of reserves, guarantees and sureties.
Perform data analysis and generation of aggregated data reports based on anonymized information for benefit of BlueSnap, Merchants, processing partners, regulators and customers, auditing practices, conducting business intelligence, performance reporting.
Compliance with internal policies, card industry and payment scheme requirements.
Payment Card Industry (PCI) assessment and validation.
Provide you with content, data and advertising tailored to your individual interests, enabling you to access BlueSnap services such as the Merchant or Shopper Control panel, support, chargeback management services.
Consensual storage of shopper payment information for subsequent or recurring transactions.
Track sellers.
Provide information to regulators, Card Associations, acquiring banks, investors and professional advisers.
BlueSnap may also use information in other ways for which we provide specific notice of at the time of collection.
Site Visitor:
As a guest we may set tracking and behavioral cookies when accessing BlueSnap site and landing pages. These may include IP, device, technical usage, time, language and geolocation data. If you decide to request more information, sign up for newsletters, set up a sales call or use support facilities you may be asked to provide name and contact details. Such information may be shared with advertising and marketing services to create and present more relevant and targeted marketing campaigns, content and products.
Shopper:
To process payment and delivery of products and services BlueSnap receives your transaction information – this may include name, ID info, address, email, phone number, delivery details, card/bank/pay wallet data, currency, transaction amount, gender, gift recipients, donations, IP, technical usage, language, geolocation and relevant affiliate tracking details. Support and post purchase services, refund and chargeback processes may require the use of similar information. You might have access to a shopper account generated by your merchant seller that is powered by or accessed through BlueSnap, to review purchases and set preferences for instance related to subscription and recurring charge transactions and payment card details.
Merchants:
Business-related information is collected including corporate structure, tax numbers, beneficial interests, beneficiaries, ID info, social security numbers, name, address, email, phone, banking details, references, financial information, locations, nationality, web site ownership, signatory information, staff access, PCI records, technical details, IP, verification and data relating to PCI/ KYC/AML/Transaction fraud checks, affiliate referral tracking details.
International Entities
BlueSnap’s services enable merchants to sell to shoppers across the world. This sometimes requires BlueSnap to provide services through specific legal entities. BlueSnap Inc., is based in the USA, and its affiliate BlueSnap Payment Services Ireland Ltd., is a regulated payments institution based in Ireland offering payment services across the EU/EEA. BlueSnap Payment Services Ltd. is a regulated UK payments institution offering payment services to merchants in the UK. BlueSnap Enterprise Canada ULC offers payment services to Canadian merchants. BlueSnap Australia Pty Limited offers payment services to Australian merchants and BlueSnap Payment Services Israel Limited provides payment services as a regulated entity to merchants based in Israel. Additional BlueSnap entities may be added and shall automatically be covered by this Privacy Policy.
How and Where Information Is Stored
BlueSnap maintains administrative, technical and physical safeguards designed to protect the personal information provided or collected against accidental, unlawful or unauthorized destruction, loss, alteration, access, disclosure or misuse. Data is also routinely backed up at secure locations in the UK and the US in accordance with standard industry practice. We follow generally accepted standards to protect the personal information submitted to us, both during transmission and once we receive it. Payment information is secured and protected in accordance with the Level 1 standards of the PCI-DSS, the definitive security certification of the payment card industry. However, no method of transmission over the Internet, or method of electronic storage, is 100% secure. Therefore, we cannot guarantee its absolute security. If you have any further questions about privacy or security, or have reason to believe your data security has been compromised please contact us immediately by sending an email to: Security@bluesnap.com.
The international nature of BlueSnap’s services means that personal data may be transferred beyond your national borders when you use BlueSnap’s services or purchase from or sell to persons or entities outside your country. By using such services you are deemed to understand and accept that data may be subject to such cross-border transfers.
How long data is retained
BlueSnap stores personal information for as long as necessary to fulfill the purpose for which the personal information was collected and as required or authorized by law. We take measures to delete or permanently de-identify personal information as required by law or if no longer required for the purpose for which it was collected. Certain data relating to transaction records particularly billing and invoice information may be required to be safeguarded for significant periods of time in accordance with standard tax and accounting law and practices, or to enable refund and chargeback requests to be processed on behalf of shoppers.
Sharing of Personal Information
BlueSnap does not sell or otherwise disclose personal information we collect about you except as disclosed in this Privacy Policy or as may be disclosed to you at the time information is collected. As indicated above data collected from web site visitors may be shared with marketing and advertising partners.
BlueSnap may share personal information collected with its subsidiaries and other BlueSnap entities that process payment transactions as well as relevant merchants, fraud prevention services, card and alternative payment services, relevant banks, payment processors/acquirers and business partners.
BlueSnap may share certain information with service providers who provide or perform services on behalf of BlueSnap. We authorize such services providers to use or disclose such information only as necessary to perform services on our behalf or to comply with legal requirements. Such entities are required by contract and/or law to safeguard the privacy and security of personal information processed on our behalf. We may also share personal information with other parties with your express consent.
Personal data used with respect to payment transactions involving individuals of the EU/EEA, Switzerland and UK often needs to be passed to other parties as part of the transaction process. Transfers of data may be through APIs, email, and other formats, and may be bi-directional. BlueSnap takes steps to ensure that such parties are committed to compliance with applicable data law including the GDPR and that any additional Data Processors or Sub-Processors used are retained under a contractual duty of compliance and are able to respond to data subject access requests. In certain situations, BlueSnap and its subsidiaries might be deemed to be acting on the instruction of other transaction services or together with such parties, in which case BlueSnap shall itself be obligated to act in a manner compliant with applicable data law.
Certain Merchants might use checkout and other systems as part of the payment transaction process that might be integrated with BlueSnap. Accordingly personal information that you provide to such services either directly or through your selected Merchant might be passed to BlueSnap.  BlueSnap treats such personal information in accordance with this Privacy Policy, however other entities might have their own policies and these should be thoroughly checked by you.
BlueSnap may use third-party service providers, for example to provide you with support when using our site and including the use of live chat software. When you sign up for our services we will share your personal information only as necessary for the third party to provide that service. Personal information collected relating to marketing and Merchant underwriting functions may be stored and processed on secure compliant cloud-based services provided by third parties to BlueSnap. Such service providers are contractually required by BlueSnap to act in compliance with relevant data law.
Merger, sale and/or transfer of corporate assets or reorganization
BlueSnap may transfer information as part of any corporate merger, sale, acquisition, transfer or assets or reorganization without notice. Such transfer will be on the basis of the continuation of all privacy rights set out in this document. You will be notified via email and/or a prominent notice on our website of any change in BlueSnap ownership or uses of your personal information, as well as any choices you may have regarding your personal information.
Compliance with court orders & law enforcement agencies
BlueSnap may be required to disclose personal information without notification in response to a lawful request by public authorities, including to meet national security requirements, or in order to comply with a legal requirement, legislation, regulation, court order or subpoena, or when we believe in good faith that disclosure is necessary to protect our rights, prevent harm of financial loss, protect your safety or the safety of others or investigate fraud or cooperate with law enforcement or government agencies, or in connection with an investigation of suspected or actual fraudulent or illegal activity.
EU/EEA, UK & Swiss Data Privacy Law
With respect to data protection legislation in the European Economic Area, UK and Switzerland including the GDPR, BlueSnap acts as ‘Data Processor’ concerning shopper information of EU/EEA/UK/Swiss-based persons that is transmitted to BlueSnap either through a merchant or directly in order to process a purchase transaction.
When preserving transaction records in accordance with regulatory or industry requirements BlueSnap may act in such circumstances as ‘Data Controller’.
When BlueSnap sets up an account for a merchant we are required to conduct to various payment security, anti-money laundering, credit and KYC checks. When managing such personal data with respect to EEA/UK/Switzerland-based individuals BlueSnap acts as a ‘Data Controller’.
The UK-based subsidiary, BlueSnap Payment Services Limited is authorized by the UK’s Financial Conduct Authority (FCA) under the Payments Services Regulations 2009/2017 reference no. 629580, for the provision of payment services in the UK. The Irish-based subsidiary BlueSnap Payment Services Ireland Limited is authorized by the Central Bank of Ireland under the EU Payment Services Regulations 2018 reference no. C431532 to provide payment services in Ireland and other EU countries.  BlueSnap Payment Services Ireland Limited is the representative for all other BlueSnap entities with respect to the provisions of the GDPR. Privacy matters concerning this company should be directed to BlueSnap through email at: PrivacyOptions@bluesnap.com
EU/EEA/UK-based users will be asked to expressly consent to provision of personal information or initial setting of cookies when visiting BlueSnap web properties so that there is a clear legal basis for processing such data. In other cases personal information will be processed legally by virtue of the performance of the contractual obligations relating to a merchant and/or shopper, BlueSnap’s legitimate interest, legal obligation or the defense or preservation of BlueSnap’s legal rights.
BlueSnap complies with legal requirements to provide adequate safeguards for the transfers of personal data outside the EU/EEA/UK and Switzerland, and as indicated above is also currently certified under the Data Privacy Framework.
Individual users from the EU/EEA or other regions with laws governing data collection and use, should note that you are agreeing to the transfer of your personal information to the United States, UK and other jurisdictions in which BlueSnap may operate. By providing your personal information with respect to a transaction or express consent mechanism, you consent to any transfer and processing in accordance with this Policy.
Individuals based in the EU/EEA, Switzerland and UK have additional statutory data subject rights as shown below under the heading: EU/EEA, Swiss and UK Data Subject Rights.
EEA, UK and Swiss individuals have the right to obtain our confirmation of whether we maintain personal information relating to you.  Upon request, we will provide you with access to the personal information that we hold about you.  You may also may correct, amend, or delete the personal information we hold about you.  An individual who seeks access, or who seeks to correct, amend, or delete inaccurate data, should direct their query to PrivacyOptions@bluesnap.com.  If requested to remove data, we will respond within a reasonable timeframe.
Your right to access your personal data may be restricted in exceptional circumstances, including, but not limited to, when the burden or expense of providing this access would be disproportionate to the risks to your privacy in the case in question, or when the rights of persons other than you would be violated by the provision of such access.  If we determine that your access should be restricted in a particular instance, we will provide you with an explanation of our determination and respond to any inquiries you may have.
We will also provide an individual opt-out or opt-in choice before we share their data with third parties other than our agents, or before we use it for a purpose other than which it was originally collected or subsequently authorized.  To limit the use and disclosure of your personal information, please submit a written request to PrivacyOptions@bluesnap.com.
In certain situations, we may be required to disclose personal data in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
Automatic Processing & Profiling
Anti-fraud checks may involve the automatic processing and profiling of personal data.
EU/EEA, Swiss and UK Data Subject Rights
Individuals from the EU/EEA, Switzerland and UK have the right to exercise additional data subject rights under data privacy laws including the following:
The right to request information about the purpose of the processing; the categories of personal data concerned; who else outside BlueSnap might have received the data from BlueSnap; what the source of the information was (if you did not provide it directly to BlueSnap); and how long it will be stored.
You have a right to correct the record of your personal data maintained by BlueSnap if it is inaccurate. You may also request that we cease using your data for direct marketing purposes.
Right of erasure: this is a right to erasure of personal information that we hold about you if it is no longer necessary in relation to the purpose for which it was originally collected. Please note that BlueSnap may need to retain certain data to complete transactions, perform refunds, maintain underwriting records or comply with legal obligations, tax and accounting requirements, etc.
Right to restrict processing of your personal information in certain circumstances, for example where such data is inaccurate or unlawfully held.
Right to data portability: this right is available in certain circumstances to receive your personal information in a structured, commonly used format and to have such data transferred to another service.
In order to exercise any of these rights please contact us as follows:
Shoppers should contact us at shoppers@bluesnap.com and Merchants should contact us at merchants@bluesnap.com
Please note that in situations where you are shopper your request to exercise a statutory right may need to be referred to the merchant who supplied the product.
Where you have provided consent to passing of personal information or cookie information to BlueSnap through an online consent form, you have the right to withdraw such consent, usually through a similar method as the original consent was given.
You may also have the right to complain to an EU/EEA or UK data protection authority about our collection and use of your personal information.
Payment data
Personal payment information such as credit card numbers, bank account information, name, email address and phone number is routinely collected and passed on to authorized payment processors, banks, acquirers, and credit card companies in order to make payments authorized by BlueSnap customers. Such information is handled through industry standard secure protocols and where appropriate in accordance with relevant Payment Card Industry (PCI) compliance standards. Such data may also be passed when making payment through mobile devices.
Payment data may also be encrypted and securely stored by BlueSnap and appropriate merchants and product suppliers in accordance with PCI standards. When expressly directed and approved by a customer it may be used to generate recurring or new transactions as requested by such customer. Transaction details may also be passed to relevant taxation authorities in respect of sales taxes, VAT, GST, withholding tax, and other relevant taxes and duties.
Minors
BlueSnap does not actively market to children and we never knowingly ask a child under 13 to divulge personal information. Services and Information available to registered users on this site are NOT INTENDED FOR USE BY ANY PERSON UNDER THE AGE OF 18.
Please note that if it comes to our attention through reliable means that a registered user is under 18, we will cancel that user’s account. Online payment transaction forms are not provided for use in any event by persons under 18 years of age.
External links
BlueSnap offer links to other websites. Please note: when clicking on links to other websites, we encourage you to read their privacy policies. Their standards may differ from ours.
Social Media Widgets
Our online properties may include social media features, such as the Facebook and Twitter buttons and widgets, such as a ‘Share this’ button or interactive mini-programs that run on our site. These features may collect your IP address, which page you are visiting on our site, and may set a cookie to enable the feature to function properly. Social media features and widgets are either hosted by a third party or hosted directly on our website. Your interactions with these features are governed by the privacy policy of the company providing it.
Forums and Group Boards
The BlueSnap website may offer comment facilities, forums and message boards. Please be advised that information voluntarily posted in these venues becomes public knowledge. To request removal of your personal information from our blog or community forum, contact us at PrivacyOptions@bluesnap.com. In some cases, we may not be able to remove your personal information, in which case we will let you know if we are unable to do so and why.
Changes in this policy & notification
BlueSnap reserves the right to change this policy as and when it sees fit. If our policy on information collection or uses changes, we will advise you by posting a dated copy here and you are advised to visit this page regularly to check for updates. If you are a registered BlueSnap merchant then you will also be advised via email. If we make any material changes we will notify you by email (sent to the email address specified in your account) or by means of a notice on this site prior to the change becoming effective.
Opt out process
You have the option not to be added to mailing lists operated by BlueSnap or a merchant/product supplier. In the case of opt out, such decision will be relayed to the relevant product supplier. To exercise your opt out rights, please send an email to PrivacyOptions@bluesnap.com requesting that your personal information be deleted from any mailing lists operated by BlueSnap or your product supplier. BlueSnap will act on your request and inform your merchant/product supplier of your request in order to fully respect your decision. You may also follow the unsubscribe instructions located at the bottom of the emails you receive.
Australian Privacy Rights
BlueSnap complies with The Australian Privacy Act 1988 (Commonwealth) and the Australia Privacy Principles. Further information is available
here
.
Cookie Policy and Tracking Technologies
Please click
here
to review our Cookie Policy and learn about our use of tracking technologies.
California & Other US State Privacy Rights
Residents of the State of California have additional statutory rights afforded by the California Civil Code, including the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018, the “CCPA”, and as from 1st January 2023 these rights have been extended to cover data transfers in connection with business to business matters and employees. In addition, Virginia (effective January 1, 2023), Colorado (effective July 1, 2023), Connecticut (July 1, 2023), Utah (December 31, 2023), Oregon (July 1, 2024), and Texas (July 1, 2024), Montana (October 1 2024), Iowa (January  1, 2025), Delaware (January 1, 2025), New Hampshire (January 1, 2025), Nebraska (January 1, 2025), New Jersey (January 15, 2025), Tennessee (July 1, 2025), Vermont (July 1, 2025), Minnesota (July 31, 2025), Maryland (October 1, 2025), Indiana (January 1, 2026) and Kentucky (January 1, 2026) have passed State laws extending similar privacy rights to consumers.
As the rules relating to some of these laws are still to be finalized, BlueSnap shall continue to monitor the situation and update this notice and internal practices accordingly.
California residents and residents of other relevant US States should consider these provisions in addition to this Policy.
In the vast majority of cases BlueSnap will be acting as a service provider to a merchant from which a shopper has purchased goods and services. In such situations you should first contact your merchant to exercise your statutory rights. If necessary the merchant will then contact BlueSnap to assist in actioning your request.
In some exceptional cases relating to sales of goods and services BlueSnap will be deemed to be acting as a’ merchant of record’ and you should contact BlueSnap directly.
Please note that BlueSnap may still need to retain certain data to complete transactions, perform refunds, maintain underwriting records or comply with legal obligations, tax and accounting requirements, etc. If this is the case BlueSnap will advise accordingly.
BlueSnap may have collected personal data from you through an information form or phone call and in such cases you should exercise your rights directly through BlueSnap.
The CCPA grants California residents the following statutory rights relating to personal information, and similar rights are granted in the other States’ legislation referred to above:
Right to request disclosure of the categories of personal data held, the categories of the sources of such data, the purposes for which it is held and the categories of personal data is disclosed to third parties.
Right to request details of the personal information relating to you that has been collected in the prior 12 months.
Right to request deletion of such data. Certain exceptions may apply.
Right to request that personal data not be sold to third parties – not applicable to BlueSnap at present
Right not to be discriminated against
Table: Categories of Data Usage, Source, Purpose and Disclosure – CCPA
Categories of Data Usage
Source
Purpose
Disclosure – CCPA
Identifiers:
contact details, cookies
Payment forms, information request forms, comment submissions, cookie technology, web & usage logs, emails, letters, phone calls, support center records, social media inputs, apps, interviews, submitted documents
Processing payment, order & transaction fulfillment, analytics, tracking, marketing, advertising, sales, invoicing, customer support, refunds, verifying customer information, customer profiling, internal research & development, product upgrade, Customer experience, debugging, quality assurance, safety, detecting and protecting against security incidents, protecting against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent or illegal activity, prosecution those responsible for such activity, compliance with laws and regulations, tax requirements, industry  and contractual requirements, recruitment.
Yes
Protected Information
: name, payment data, user name, password, payment card details
Yes
Commercial information
: purchase records, purchase histories, purchase tendencies
Yes
Internet/electronic activity:
browsing history, search history, web site, application, interaction or ad interaction
Yes
Geolocation
Yes
Audio data
Yes
Professional- or employment-related data
No
Education data
No
Inferences from all above
Yes
Table Categories of Data and Categories of Third Party Disclosure – CCPA
Data Categories
Recipients
Identifiers: contact details, cookies
Fraud review services, analytics and marketing services, payment processors, banks, card payment providers, law enforcement
Protected Information:
name, payment data, user name, password, payment card details
Fraud review services, analytics and marketing services, payment processors, banks, card payment providers, currency exchange services, law enforcement, email services, CRM services
Commercial information:
purchase records, purchase histories, purchase tendencies
Fraud review services, analytics and marketing services,
Internet/electronic activity:
browsing history, search history, web site, application or ad interaction
Fraud review services, analytics, advertising and marketing services, payment processors, CRM services, social media application services
Geolocation
Fraud review services, analytics and marketing services, payment processors, banks, card payment providers, law enforcement, email services, CRM services, social media application services
Audio data
Fraud review services, analytics and marketing services, payment processors, banks, card payment providers, law enforcement, email services, CRM services
BlueSnap collects personal information as set out in the above category tables as designated by the CCPA.
BlueSnap does not sell, disclose or share your personal information for valuable consideration. As a result there is no opt-out of sale process.
Making a Request in Support of your Statutory Rights
Residents of California and certain other States may make a request relating to statutory rights by completing this
online form
or by free phone service 866-312-7733.
If your data was submitted as part of a purchase transaction you are reminded to first check if your request should be submitted to the relevant merchant.
You will be asked to confirm that you are a resident of an appropriate State and in the process of servicing your request BlueSnap may require you to verify your identity in accordance with the CCPA or other State legislation.  Verification procedures include: providing details of any relevant purchase such as an order number, product purchase, date of purchase, location, contact information, information submitted, etc.
BlueSnap shall provide an initial response within 10 days. Your request will normally be completed within 45 days.
These time periods are subject to State-by-State variance.
A request for a copy of personal information can only be made twice in any 12-month period.
Do Not Track Signals
BlueSnap does not respond to “do not track” (DNT) signals transmitted from web browsers and therefore does not alter any of data collection and use practices upon receipt of such a signal.
Brazilian Privacy Rights
Users who reside in Brazil have the benefit of Lei Geral de Protecao de Dados (LGPD).
The grounds on which BlueSnap processes your personal information
BlueSnap processes your personal information solely if we have a legal basis for such processing as set out under the LGPD. The most relevant are:
your consent to the relevant processing activities;
compliance with a legal or regulatory obligation that lies with us;
the carrying out of a contract and its preliminary procedures, in cases where you are a party to said contract;
the exercising of our rights in judicial, administrative or arbitration procedures;
our legitimate interests, provided that your fundamental rights and liberties do not prevail over such interests.
To find out more about the legal bases, you can contact BlueSnap at any time using the contact details provided in this document.
Categories of personal information processed
To find out what categories of your personal information are processed, see the section above titled “The Information BlueSnap Collects.”
Why we process your personal information
To find out why we process your personal information, see the section above titled “Use of Information Collected.”
Your Brazilian privacy rights, how to file a request and BlueSnap’s response to your requests
Your Brazilian privacy rights
You have the right to:
obtain confirmation of the existence of processing activities on your personal information;
access to your personal information;
have incomplete, inaccurate or outdated personal information rectified;
obtain the anonymization, blocking or elimination of your unnecessary or excessive personal information, or of information that is not being processed in compliance with the LGPD;
obtain information on the possibility to provide or deny your consent and the consequences thereof;
obtain information about the third parties with whom we share your personal information;
obtain, upon your express request, the portability of your personal information (except for anonymized information) to another service or product provider, provided that our
commercial and industrial secrets are safeguarded;
obtain the deletion of your personal information being processed if the processing was based upon your consent, unless one or more exceptions provided for in art. 16 of the LGPD apply;
revoke your consent at any time;
lodge a complaint related to your personal information with the ANPD (the National Data Protection Authority) or with consumer protection bodies;
oppose a processing activity in cases where the processing is not carried out in compliance with the provisions of the law;
request clear and adequate information regarding the criteria and procedures used for an automated decision; and
request the review of decisions made solely on the basis of the automated processing of your personal information, which affect your interests. These include decisions to define
your personal, professional, consumer and credit profile, or aspects of your personality.
You will not be discriminated against, or otherwise suffer any sort of detriment, if you exercise your rights.
How to file your request
You can file your express request to exercise your rights free from any charge, at any time, by contacting us at PrivacyOptions@bluesnap.com, and referencing the LGPD.
How and when BlueSnap will respond to your request
BlueSnap will strive to promptly respond to your requests. In any case, should it be impossible for us to do so, we will make sure to communicate to you the factual or legal reasons that prevent us from immediately, or otherwise ever, complying with your requests. In cases where we are not processing your personal information, we will indicate to you the physical or legal person to whom you should address your requests, if we are in the position to do so.
In the event that you file an access or personal information processing confirmation request, please make sure that you specify whether you would like your personal information to be delivered in electronic or printed form.
BlueSnap will respond within 15 days from the time of your request, providing you with information on the origin of your personal information, confirmation on whether or not records exist, any criteria used for the processing and the purposes of the processing, while safeguarding our commercial and industrial secrets.
Transfer of personal information outside of Brazil permitted by the law
BlueSnap is allowed to transfer your personal information outside of the Brazilian territory in circumstances provided by the LGPD.
Previous Versions:
v.2.6 Date: 10 October 2023
v.2.5 Date: 27 December 2022
v.2.4 Date: 23 March 2022
v.2.3 Date: 28 September 2021
v.2.2 Date: 09 October 2020
v.2.1 Date: 31 December 2019
v.2.0 Date: May 25, 2018
v1.13 Date: April 12, 2017
v1.12 September 14, 2016
v1.11 January 28, 2016
v1.10 December 21, 2014
v1.9 July 10, 2014
v1.8 July 7, 2013
v1.7 December 2, 2012
v1.6 November 12, 2012*
v1.5 April 10, 2012
v1.4 March 1, 2010
v1.3 February 12, 2007
*References to BlueSnap Inc. added April 3rd, 2012
**ANNEX I hyperlink added March 3, 2025
BlueSnap uses cookies to personalize content, enable social media features and analyse website traffic. You can manage your preferences in Cookie Settings.
> Cookie Settings
Accept Cookies
Your Privacy
Strictly Necessary Cookies
Functional Cookies
Performance Cookies
Targeting Cookies
Your Privacy
When you visit our website, we store cookies on your browser to collect information. The information collected might relate to you, your preferences or your device, and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to and to provide a more personalized web experience. However, you can choose not to allow certain types of cookies, which may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings according to your preference. You cannot opt-out of our First Party Strictly Necessary Cookies as they are deployed in order to ensure the proper functioning of our website (such as prompting the cookie banner and remembering your settings, to log into your account, to redirect you when you log out, etc.). For more information about the First and Third Party Cookies used please follow this link.
More information
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms.    You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages.    If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site.    All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites.    They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Back Button
Back
Filter Button
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Sub-policy 2
https://www.cleverbridge.com/corporate/privacy-policy/:
Our use of cookies
By clicking “Accept All Cookies”, you agree to the storing of cookies on your device to enhance site navigation, analyze site usage, and assist in our marketing efforts. You can change your preferences at any time by clicking on "Cookie Settings" at the bottom of this page.
Accept All Cookies
Reject All
Cookies Settings
Privacy Preference Center
Your data belongs to you. That's why we want you to know exactly what type of data we collect and what we do with it. When you visit a website, cookies are set to store or retrieve information from your browser. The information collected by these cookies may relate to your preferences, your device, or to making the website work the way you expect it to. Cookies are sometimes set by us and sometimes by third parties whose services are used by cleverbridge. You can learn more about the different categories of cookies we use on this website and choose to enable or disable them in the cookie settings. You can change these settings at any time by clicking on "Cookie Settings" at the bottom of this page. Blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
More information
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms.    You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages.    If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site.    All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites.    They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 3
http://www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Technologies
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
How Google uses cookies
How Google uses location information
How Google uses credit card numbers for payments
How Google Voice works
Google Product Privacy Guide
How Google retains data we collect
Google advertising services are experimenting with new ways of supporting the delivery and measurement of digital advertising in ways that better protect people’s privacy online via the
Privacy Sandbox
initiative on Chrome and Android. Users with the relevant Privacy Sandbox settings enabled in Chrome or Android may see relevant ads from Google’s advertising services based on
Topics
or
Protected Audience
data stored on their browser or mobile device. Google’s advertising services may also measure ad performance using
Attribution Reporting
data stored on their browser or mobile device.
More information on the Privacy Sandbox
.
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Many websites and apps use Google services to improve their content and keep it free. When they integrate our services, these sites and apps share information with Google.
For example, when you visit a website that uses advertising services like AdSense, including analytics tools like Google Analytics, or embeds video content from YouTube, your web browser automatically sends certain information to Google. This includes the URL of the page you’re visiting and your IP address. We may use the IP address, for example, to identify your general location, to measure the effectiveness of ads, and, depending on your settings, to improve the relevance of the ads you see. We may also
set cookies on your browser
or read cookies that are already there. Apps that use Google advertising services also share information with Google, such as the name of the app and a unique identifier for advertising.
Google uses the information shared by sites and apps to deliver our services, maintain and improve them, develop new services, measure the effectiveness of advertising, protect against fraud and abuse, and personalize content and ads you see on Google and on our partners’ sites and apps. See our
Privacy Policy
to learn more about how we process data for each of these purposes and our
Advertising
page for more about Google ads, how your information is used in the context of advertising, and how long Google stores this information.
Our
Privacy Policy
explains the legal grounds Google relies upon to process your information — for example, we may process your information with your consent or to pursue legitimate interests such as providing, maintaining and improving our services to meet the needs of our users.
Sometimes, when processing information shared with us by sites and apps, those sites and apps will ask for your consent before allowing Google to process your information. For example, a banner may appear on a site asking for consent for Google to process the information that site collects. When that happens, we will respect the purposes described in the consent you give to the site or app, rather than the legal grounds described in the Google Privacy Policy. If you want to change or withdraw your consent, you should visit the site or app in question to do so.
Ad personalization
If ad personalization is turned on, Google will use your information to make your ads more useful for you. For example, a website that sells mountain bikes might use Google's ad services. After you visit that site, you could see an ad for mountain bikes on a different site that shows ads served by Google.
If ad personalization is off, Google will not collect or use your information to create an ad profile or personalize the ads Google shows to you. You will still see ads, but they may not be as useful. Ads may still be based on the topic of the website or app you're looking at, your current search terms, or on your general location, but not on your interests, search history, or browsing history. Your information can still be used for the other purposes mentioned above, such as to measure the effectiveness of advertising and protect against fraud and abuse.
When you interact with a website or app that uses Google services, you may be asked to choose whether you want to see personalized ads from ad providers, including Google. Regardless of your choice, Google will not personalize the ads you see if your ad personalization setting is off or your account is ineligible for personalized ads.
You can see and control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your
ad settings
.
How you can control the information collected by Google on these sites and apps
Here are some of the ways you can control the information that is shared by your device when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services:
Ad Settings
helps you control ads you see on Google services (such as Google Search or YouTube), or on non-Google websites and apps that use Google ad services. You can also
learn how
ads are personalized, opt out of ad personalization, and block specific advertisers.
If you are signed in to your Google Account, and depending on your Account settings,
My Activity
allows you to review and control data that’s created when you use Google services, including the information we collect from the sites and apps you have visited. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Many websites and apps use Google Analytics to understand how visitors engage with their sites or apps. If you don’t want Analytics to be used in your browser, you can
install the Google Analytics browser add-on
. Learn more about
Google Analytics and privacy
.
Incognito mode in Chrome
allows you to browse the web without recording webpages and files in your browser or Account history (unless you choose to sign in). Cookies are deleted after you've closed all of your incognito windows and tabs, and your bookmarks and settings are stored until you delete them. Learn more about
cookies
. Using Incognito mode in Chrome or other private browsing modes does not prevent the collection of data when you visit websites that use Google services, and Google may still collect data when you visit websites using these browsers.
Many browsers, including Chrome, allow you to block third-party cookies. You can also clear any existing cookies from within your browser. Learn more about
managing cookies in Chrome
.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Sub-policy 4
https://studentprivacypledge.org/:
Skip to Main Content
ABOUT THE PLEDGE
The Future of Privacy Forum (FPF) and The Software & Information Industry Association (SIIA) introduced a Student Privacy Pledge to safeguard student privacy regarding the collection, maintenance, and use of student personal information. The commitments are intended to concisely detail existing federal law and regulatory guidance regarding the collection and handling of student data, and to encourage service providers to more clearly articulate these practices. FPF and SIIA updated the Student Privacy Pledge in our Pledge process in 2020. To learn more, please visit the FAQs page.
The Pledge is not intended as a comprehensive privacy policy nor to be inclusive of all requirements to achieve compliance with all applicable federal or state laws. For additional information and guidance on relevant laws for parents, educators, and service providers, visit
studentprivacycompass.org
.
Student Privacy Pledge Signatories:
498
Look for these logos to identify companies that have taken the pledge.
Recent Signatories
Smartschool
Bull Valley Software
Beable Education
Schoolhouse Photos
Cursive Technology
Social Cipher
Prodigy Education
Canva for Education
Essential Skills Software
GAT Labs
Rang Rewards
Subjective Labs
11trees
3C Institute
42Gears Mobility Systems
5-Star Students
95 Percent Group
Abre
Accelerate Learning
Activate Learning
Additio App
Aequitas Solutions
Aeries Software
Age of Learning for Schools, Inc.
ALL In Learning
America's Software Corporation
Amplify
Amplio Learning Technologies
Annotate (Simpliphi Inc)
ANTON
Aperture Education
Appazur Solutions
Apple
ArgoPrep
AristotleK12
Artsonia
Ascend Math
AssistiveWare
ASSISTments
AT&T
Atomi
Attainment Company
AvePoint
Axiom Dashboards
Baamboozle
Banzai
BASE Education
Beable Education
Beanstack
Benchmark Education
BitOGenius
Blackboard
Blooket
Bloomz
Blueye
Boddle Learning
Book Creator (Tools for School)
Book Taco
Bookelicious
BookNook
Boom Learning
Botdoc
Boxie
Brainfuse
BrainPOP
BrainQuake
Branching Minds
Breakout
Brisk Teaching
Britannica Education
Bull Valley Software
Buncee by Capstone
Business U
BusinessU
ByDesign Platforms
Canva for Education
Capit Learning
Capstone
Carnegie Learning
CatchOn (acquired by LightSpeed)
CCI Learning Solutions
Cedar Labs
Centervention
Chan Zuckerberg Initiative
Character Lab
Cheng & Tsui Co., Inc.
Cisco - Webex
Class Companion
Class Solver
Class Technologies, Inc.
ClassBank
Classcraft (acquired by HMH)
ClassDojo
ClassHook
Classkick
ClassLink
Classworks
Clever
Closegap
Code.org
CodeCombat
CodeMonkey
codeSpark Academy
Common Threads
CommonLit
Community Brands
CompuScholar, Inc.
Conover Company
CoSpaces Edu
Couragion
CPSI
Curriculum Associates
Cursive Technology
D2L (Brightspace)
DBQ Online
Deledao
DeltaMath
Desmos
Digital Theatre
DiplomaSender
Discovery Education
DOGOnews
Don Johnston, Inc.
Double Time Docs
Drawp for School
Dreambox
Easelly Infographic Design Tool
EBSCO Information Services
Echo360
Edabit
Edcite
Edficiency
Edge Factor
EdGems Math
Edia Learning
EdisonLearning
EdLight
Edlink
Edmentum
eDoctrina Corporation
EDpuzzle
Edsby
Edthena
Education Analytics
Education Framework
Education Logistics
Education Perfect
Edulastic
Edupoint
Eduready360
Eduspire Solutions
eDynamic Learning
Elementari
Elevate K-12
Elevation Education Solutions
Embrace Software for Education
Emotional ABCs
Enlearn
Enriching Students
Epic! Creations
ePrep, Inc.
Ereflect
eScholar
ESP Solutions Group
eSpark
Essential Education
Essential Skills Software
EVERFI
Everybody Learn
EveryDay Labs
Everyday Speech
Explain Everything, Inc.
Extempore App
FamilyBookForm
Fathom Reads
FEV Tutor
FinalForms
Find Your Grind
First in Math
Flashlight Learning
Flat for Education
Flocabulary
Floop Edu
Flow Reading Fluency
Flowlab
FMX
FocalPointK12
Follett School Solutions
Forefront Education
Formative
formED SMART
Foundry
Frogtummy
Frontline Education
G Suite for Education (By Google)
Gaggle
GAT Labs
GeoGebra
Get More Math
Giant Steps
Gibbs Smith Education
Gimkit, Inc
Girls Who Code
Global Grid for Learning
GoGuardian
Gooru
GoSchoolBox
GradeCam
Gradient Learning
GrammarFlip
Great Minds
Guided Readers
Hall Photography
Hāpara
Healthy Player ONE
Heartland Business Systems
Houghton Mifflin Harcourt
HR Imaging Partners
Humy.ai
Ident-A-Kid
identiMetrics
Ifrit Technologies
Images, Inc
Imagine Learning LLC
IncidentIQ
Infini-D Learning
Infinite Campus
Inmagine Lab(pixlr)
Instructure
Intellispark
Inter-State Studio
Interactive Health Technologies
Intrado SchoolMessenger
Intuit, Inc.
Invincible
IQRA Network
Istation
iTutor.com
IXL Learning
Jamf
JDL Horizons
Jiveworld
Joy School English (Alegra Learning)
Just Right Reader
Kahoot!
Kami
KAZ Type
Khan Academy
Kialo Edu
Kialo GmbH (Kialo Edu)
Kiddom
Kimono
Kinvolved
Knowt
KOBI
Kodable
Kognity
Komeer
Kuder
LEAD
Learning Ally
Learning Without Tears
Learnosity
Legacy Studios
Legends of Learning
LessonLoop
Let's Go Learn
Level All
Level Data
Lexercise
Lexia Learning Systems
Lexxica
Lexya
Library Pass
Lifetouch
Lighthaus
Lightspeed Systems
Lincoln Learning Solutions
Linewize by Qoria
LinkIt!
Listenwise
Littera Education
Little Bee Speech Co.
LiveSchool
Loopdata
Lumen Touch
Lumos Learning
Lync SSO
MackinVIA
Maestro SIS (BocaVox)
Magic School
Magnus Health
MajorClarity
MakeMusic
Manage1to1
Managed Methods
Mandarin Library Automation
MARIO Framework
Mastery Coding
Mastery Portfolio
Mastery Transcript Consortium
Math Games (TeachMe)
MathFactLab
Mathigon
Mathspace
McGraw Hill
Membean
Merge EDU
MidSchoolMath
MIND Education
Minga Solutions
MobyMax
Modular Robotics
Moodle
Mootivation Technologies
Moozoom Education
Mosa Mack Science
Mote
My Math Academy
myHomework
n2y
Naiku
NaNoWriMo Young Writers Program
National Student Clearinghouse
NCS Pearson
Nearpod
Neptune Navigate
NetRef by Qoria
New Classrooms
Newsela
Nexam Solution, Inc.
NinGenius Studios
NoodleTools
NoRedInk
Nucleus Robotics
One to One Plus (Edutek Solutions)
OnForm
Operoo
Ori Learning
ORIGO Education
Otus
OverDrive
Overgrad
Ozo Edu
Pactful
Panorama Education
PAPER
PAPERbasket
ParentSquare
Parlay Ideas
PBIS Rewards
Pear Deck
PickUp Patrol
PikMyKid
Pioneer Valley Books
Pivot Interactives
Pixel Press Technology
Pixton Comics
Planbook
Podsie
PRC-Saltillo
Prepd LLC
PrepFactory
Presentria Canada Inc.
PRIVO
Proctorio
Prodigy Education
Project Education
Project Lead The Way
Project STEM
Promethean
Prowise
PSNI
QoreInsights
Qoria
QuaverEd
Questionmark
Questodio
Quizizz
Radix LMS
Rang Rewards
Raptor Technologies
Ravenna Solutions
REA Test Prep
ReachMyTeach
Read Naturally
Readlee
ReadWorks
Really Great Reading
RedCritter
Remind
Renaissance (not including Illuminate Education)
Renzulli Learning
Replit, Inc.
Richer Picture
Risk-Eraser
Riverside Assessments
RobotLAB
RocketLit
Roxxem
Rubin Education
Runestone Academy
SAFARI Montage
Savvas Learning Company
Scholastic
SchoolDoc
Schoolhouse Photos
SchooLinks
Schoolwide
Scirra
Scoir
ScootPad
Screencastify
Screenleap
Securly
Seesaw Learning
Señor Wooly
Shoelace Learning
Sibme
Sight Reading Factory
simpledu
Simpliphi, Inc.
Skyward
SLP Now
SMART Technologies
SmartClass
SmartPass
Smartschool
Smoothwall by Qoria
Social Cipher
Sourcewell Technology
Spark Space
Speak Agent
SplashLearn
Stackup
STEMscopes
Stile
Storyboard That
structal
Student Lap Tracker
Studies Weekly
StudyForge Digital Curriculum
Studyo
Stukent
Subjective Labs
Summit K12
Super Duper
Swivl
Tales2go
TalkAbroad
TalkingPoints
TarteeleQuran Learn Quran Online
Teach Your Monster
Teachally
TeachBoost
Teachers Pay Teachers (Teacher Synergy LLC)
Teachers' Curriculum Institute (TCI)
Teachley
TeachTown
TeamBuildr
Teddy Bear Portraits
TestOut Corporation
Texthelp
The WNET Group
ThingLink
ThinkCERCA
ThoughtExchange
Tobii Dynavox
Tools of the Mind
Tools4ever
TransACT
trovvit
TumbleWeed Press
Turnitin
Twine
Tynker
Typesy
TypeTastic!
Typing Agent
Typing Pal (Druide Informatique)
Typing.com
Unicon
Verificient
Viinko
Vocabulary.com
Voces Digital
VoiceThread
Walsworth Publishing Company
Wayside Publishing
Wefivesoft
WELNET Software (Focused Fitness)
WeVideo
WIDA at University of Wisconsin Madison
William H. Sadlier, Inc.
Wixie
Wizer Learning
Wonder Workshop
Writable
Write About
Xello
XtraMath
Yegros Educational LLC
YellowFolder
You Get It First
Zearn
ZipGrade
Ziplet
Zoom Video Communications, Inc.
zSpace
See All Signatories
Support for The Student Privacy Pledge
FUTURE OF PRIVACY FORUM (FPF)
At a time when parents, teachers, schools, and administrators are more dependent than ever before on technology to support education and enable online learning, The Student Privacy Pledge is an important step forward in ensuring the tools students use to learn to enhance student privacy and promote data security. Like its predecessor, the Student Privacy Pledge demonstrates signatories’ ongoing commitment to safeguarding student data. The commitments in The Student Privacy Pledge will ensure that the Pledge continues to enhance trust between families, schools, and third-party service providers and to support the safe and effective use of student data for student, teacher, and school success.
– JULES POLONETSKY | CEO
SOFTWARE & INFORMATION INDUSTRY ASSOCIATION (SIIA)
For six years, the Pledge has stood as a clear industry commitment
protecting the privacy and security of student information. The updates to the Pledge reflect a lengthy and collaborative process of stakeholder engagement representing the needs of our community. These updates stand as an important example of industry-leading to address legitimate privacy concerns.
– JEFF JOSEPH | PRESIDENT
CONSORTIUM FOR SCHOOL NETWORKING (COSN)
Education technology leaders expect transparency from their service providers and public commitments to privacy safeguards. The new K-12 Service Provider Pledge to Safeguard Student Privacy is a useful tool in building more transparency across the ecosystem and will be beneficial to school systems in support of their larger assessments of service providers.
– KEITH R. KRUEGER | CEO
DATA QUALITY CAMPAIGN
Everyone who uses student information has a responsibility to maintain students’ privacy and the security of their data. This pledge is an important declaration that vendors take seriously their obligation to safeguard student data – and that companies who opt into this public commitment are willing to be held accountable for doing so. Responsible practices that protect student data privacy ensure that data is used to help students, never to harm them. – Jennifer Bell-Ellwanger, president and CEO, Data Quality Campaign
– JENNIFER BELL-ELLWANGER | PRESIDENT AND CEO
NATIONAL SCHOOL BOARDS ASSOCIATION (NSBA)
This industry-led pledge to honor student data privacy is crucial as schools launch virtual platforms on a large scale. Ed tech providers who opt to take the pledge are demonstrating their public commitment to responsible data practices in a manner that will support school boards’ ongoing efforts to safeguard student privacy and ensure data security.
– ANNA MARIA CHÁVEZ | EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR AND CEO
Innovate Edu | Project Unicorn
Privacy and security in education data is more important now than ever as schools adopt more edtech tools into their digital ecosystems. With the exciting release of the updated Student Privacy Pledge, new provisions and core protections will do more to support safe student data collection and preservation. Project Unicorn supports and endorses the Student Privacy Pledge as the gold standard in the edtech industry for communicating and compelling best privacy and security practices, making it an essential metric in the Project Unicorn Interoperability Rubric.
– ERIN MOTE | EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR
The Pledge
Expand Navigation
Legacy Privacy Pledge
Privacy Pledge (Spanish)
Apply To The Pledge
Signatories
Guidelines & FAQs
Press Releases
Close Modal
Sub-policy 5
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/:
You need to enable JavaScript to run this app.
Please wait while application initialize...
;
Sub-policy 6
https://www.jamf.com/employee-privacy-notice/:
Jamf Software, LLC Employee Privacy Notice
DATE UPDATED:
Dec. 17, 2024
The purpose of this notice is to provide you further details regarding employee personal information that may be processed by Jamf and is intended to supplement our
Privacy Policy
. Unless otherwise noted or excluded by context, “employee personal information” is included within the definition of “personal information” for the purposes of this notice. Jamf may update this notice from time to time. In the event we make any material changes, we will notify you by email or by posting the revised notice on our corporate website. The date of the most recent revision to this notice will be posted at the end of this notice. Any revisions will become effective upon seven (7) calendar days following such posting on our corporate website.
JAMF Software, LLC, or its affiliates (collectively, “Jamf”) may collect personal information from prospective and present employees only for legitimate business purposes, as described in the Appendix to this notice and in accordance with applicable laws, including data privacy/protection laws and regulations. Employee personal information on health, performance evaluations, disciplinary actions, and other sensitive employee matters, whether it is stored manually or electronically, is accessible by other Jamf employees only, if necessary, with respect to legitimate human resources purposes; however, an employee’s picture and any personal information the employee chooses to provide may be placed on the Jamf intranet. Likewise, from time to time, an employee’s picture along with personal information may be published in Jamf directories, internal websites and used in presentations.
For legitimate human resources purposes, employees may choose to voluntarily disclose personal information about family members and other individuals, including the beneficiaries of employment benefits and emergency contacts. If Jamf employees choose to do this, the individual’s personal information shall be treated, for the purposes of this notice, the same as an employee’s personal information. It is the employee’s responsibility to inform any such individuals about this notice and ensure that the employee has the right to provide the individual’s personal information to Jamf.
Employee personal information is never sold, leased, or rented to any third party. Employee personal information will never be disclosed to third parties except as follows:
To those retained by Jamf for processing only for the purposes set forth above;
Where required pursuant to an applicable law, governmental or judicial order, law, or regulation, or to protect the rights or property of Jamf;
In the event of sale of the business, merger, acquisition, etc.;
Where authorized electronically or in writing by the employee; and
Where the employee voluntarily provides personal information, and the context makes it clear that employee personal information will be provided to a third party/sub-processor (ex. payroll, benefits, travel, reimbursement, and other systems used in the employment context).
Where personal information is transferred from the EU, UK, or Switzerland to the US in the context of the employment relationship, we will cooperate in investigations by and comply with the advice of relevant data protection authorities.
If you are a resident of California, please see the California Addendum below for additional details on how Jamf handles your personal information.
Appendix – Description and Uses of Employee Personal Information
1. Who is responsible for processing and who can I contact?
The data controller is Jamf Software, LLC, or its affiliates (“
Jamf
” or the “
Company
”) and the responsible person can be contacted with any questions about this notice or Jamf’s privacy practices at
privacy@jamf.com
.
2. What sources and information do we use?
We may obtain your information directly from you (during the recruitment process and during employment) and from third parties, such as recruitment agencies, our affiliates, your colleagues and managers, references you provide, prior employers or schools, pre-employment screening services, such as background check providers (where permitted by law), job board websites, providers of employee benefits, social media networks, and publicly available databases.
Please see point 3 below for more information.
3. What types of personal information do we process, why do we process the personal information (purpose of the processing) and on what legitimate basis?
Categories of personal information
Purpose of processing
Legitimate basis
Name and surname, date of birth, contact details (address, phone number, e-mail address), PESEL number, ID number, education, qualifications, previous employment, tax number (NIP), place of birth, information on family members, bank account number, information on contract of employment (start and end dates, role and location, working hours, salary, benefits and holiday entitlement), information related to pension schemes, performance at work, training records, absences (sick leave, holiday, etc.), information on disciplinary measures, image, information about military duty and other information required by employment and social security laws or needed to carry out Jamf’s business
Realization of employment duties and carrying out Jamf’s business
Employment management through an Employer of Record (EOR) service (Applicable to employees in Spain and Zimbabwe)
Compliance with legal obligations of Jamf as an employer
Jamf’s legitimate interests consistent with carrying out business activity
Necessity to perform employment contract
Employee’s consent (image)
Jamf’s legitimate interest consistent with carrying out emergency notification
Racial or ethnic origin, gender, veteran status, disability, marital status, LGBTQIA+ status
DEIB analysis and reporting
Employee’s explicit consent
Information needed through the carrier service includes name, e-mail address, phone number, call history, SMS history (not messages), aggregated data usage, network traffic, SIM, device identifiers (if device is managed)
Provide optional Jamf-purchased telecommunication service and/or hardware
Compliance with legal obligations
Jamf’s legitimate interests consistent with ensuring that its business activities and continuity
Geolocation coordinates (optional)
Geolocation data, such as device location and approximate location derived from IP address
Emergency notification based on dynamic location for business continuity
Relative location, like IP address, is used for dynamic management of devices and protecting Jamf’s networks
Jamf’s legitimate interest consistent with carrying out emergency notification
Jamf’s legitimate interests consistent with carrying out business activity
Name, position, father’s name, PESEL, NIP, date and place of birth, contact details, information about accident, information about suffered harm, ID number, position, name, surname and contact details of the third party - contact person in case of accidents at work
Documenting accidents at work
Compliance with legal obligations of Jamf as an employer
Information relating to the course of employment, including appraisals, efficiency / utilization reports and evaluation reports
Promotion and career development opportunities
Compliance with legal obligations of Jamf as an employer
Necessity to perform employment contract
Legitimate interest pursued by Jamf consistent with promotion of Jamf as an employer
Name, passport details, nationality, date of birth, address, work phone numbers, e-mail and other information required for organizing business travel or visas
Business travel & visas
Necessity for performance of a contract between employee and Jamf (including with regard to business travel outside of the EEA)
Legitimate interests pursued by Jamf consistent with ensuring travel documents where necessary
Name, e-mail address, phone number, role in the company, image
Promotion of Jamf (e.g., through promotional materials)
Jamf’s legitimate interests consistent with promoting its business
Necessity for the performance of employment contract
Employee’s consent (image)
Name and surname, information relating to conduct subject to disciplinary investigations or proceedings, information on actions or omissions necessary to detect fraud or other criminal offenses related to Jamf’s business
Carrying out disciplinary investigations
Prevention and detection of fraud or criminal offenses related to Jamf’s business
Compliance with legal obligations, including employment law
Jamf’s legitimate interests consistent with ensuring that its business activity is compliant with law
Personal information concerning health, to the extent permitted by law
Initial and periodic medical check-ups, sick leave, adjustment of workplace in case of disabilities
Post-accident documentation
Carrying out legal obligations of employer
Name, position in the company, work phone numbers and e-mail, business correspondence and any other information required in legal proceedings
Participating in legal proceedings by Jamf
Legitimate interests pursued by Jamf consistent with establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims
Compliance with legal obligations
Racial or ethnic origin, information concerning health or any other information of special categories — only if needed in legal proceedings
Participating in legal proceedings
Establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims by Jamf
Cameras on external doors and in sensitive areas
Information related to the use of Jamf assets, productivity applications and systems
Access information collected from office badge readers
Monitoring of activity relevant to protecting employees and company assets
Legitimate interests pursued by Jamf consistent with ensuring security and privacy
Name, contact details (personal and work emails, phone number), date of birth, gender, image, nationality, professional, trade union, and union memberships
Social and Economic Committee Elections (Applicable only to employees in France)
Compliance with legal obligations
Employee’s explicit consent
Occasionally, and where appropriate, we may seek your consent in writing to process specific personal information. If we do that, we will explain the purpose of the processing. In these situations, you have the right to refuse or withdraw your consent at any time by contacting the appropriate person named in the consent document.
4. Who is the recipient of my information?
We will share your personal information with:
Jamf affiliates;
Jamf’s customers and vendors;
private health and benefit providers;
insurers and pensions scheme providers;
federal and state authorities, e.g., tax authority, social security authority, law enforcement;
entities providing services to Jamf, such as IT or payroll services;
potential purchasers and their professional advisers in the context of the sale or restructuring of the whole or part of our business,
hotels, airlines, reservation centres (for business travel purposes).
5. Is personal information transferred to a third country or to an international organization?
Jamf is a global organization and to ensure the provision of effective and efficient services and communication throughout Jamf, we are required to transfer your personal information internationally.
Your personal information may therefore be stored and processed abroad in countries that may have different data protection rules. However, Jamf will only transfer your personal information outside of the EEA and the UK where appropriate safeguards have been put in place. Jamf will ensure that the employee personal information will remain protected as required by applicable law and regulations, even when transferred across borders to a third party including, but not limited to, the use of European Commission-approved model clauses, UK Addendum, and other data transfer safeguards.
For more information on how Jamf safeguards employee personal information, please contact
privacy@jamf.com
.
6. How long will my personal information be retained?
Jamf retains your employee personal information (including your sensitive personal information) for as long as needed or permitted in light of the purposes for which it was collected and in accordance with applicable laws, including data privacy/protection laws and local labor laws. The criteria used to determine our retention periods include:
The duration of your employment or contract with us;
The length of time we have an ongoing relationship with you or your dependents/beneficiaries and the length of time thereafter during which we may have a legitimate need to reference your personal information to address issues that may arise;
Whether there is a legal obligation to which we are subject, for example, certain laws may require us to keep your employment records for a certain period of time; and
Whether retention is advisable in light of our legal position, such as in regard to applicable statutes of limitations, litigation, or regulatory investigations.
7. What choices and rights do I have?
You may request further details regarding Jamf’s processing of your employee personal information in accordance with local applicable law. You may have certain rights over your personal information, depending on the applicable jurisdiction, including but not limited to:
A right to receive details about or access to your personal information;
A right to erase certain personal information;
A right to stop your personal information being processed in certain circumstances;
A right related to automated profiling;
A right to portability;
A right to correct your personal information; and
A right to opt-out of the sale of your personal information.
There are limitations in relation to these rights. Please contact privacy@jamf.com or your human resources representative for more details.
8. Do I have an obligation to make personal information available?
Providing the following personal information is necessary for the conclusion and performance of your employment with Jamf and has its legal basis in employment law: (a) first name (names) and surname; (b) date of birth; (c) contact details that you share with us (at least residential address); (d) education; (e) qualifications, if required to perform work in a given position or of a given type; (f) work experience (previous employment); (g) your personal identification number or type and series number of another document confirming your identity (e.g., government issued identification card); (h) your other personal information, as well as names and dates of birth of your children and other members of your immediate family, if the provision of such information is necessary due to the use of special rights provided for in the labour law; and (i) bank account number, unless you have requested cash payment of your remuneration. It is not possible to create and sustain an employment relationship or perform an employment contract (as applicable) without processing your personal information within the above scope.
Jamf as your employer may also request you to provide other personal information, if the obligation to provide it results from other provisions of law or if another lawful purpose exists.
California Addendum—For Residents of California
This California Addendum applies to California residents and supplements the information provided above in the Employee Privacy Notice.
Collection and Disclosure of Personal Information
The following chart details which categories of personal information we may collect and process, as well as which categories of personal information we may disclose to which third parties for our operational business and employment purposes, including within the 12 months preceding the date this notice was last updated.
Categories of personal information
Disclosed to which categories of third parties for operational business purposes
Identifiers
, such as name, contact details (address, phone number, email), date of birth,unique personal identifiers, IP address, account name, online identifiers, photo badges, beneficiary designations, and government-issued identifiers (e.g., Social Security number, driver’s license number, passport number)
Our affiliates; our customers; service providers that provide services such as payroll, background check vendors (where permitted by law), consulting, training, expense management, medical/health, IT, and other services; health, insurance, and benefits providers; professional advisors, such as accountants, auditors, bankers, and lawyers; third-party travel providers, for business travel purposes; public and governmental authorities, such as regulatory authorities and law enforcement
Personal information as defined in the California customer records law
such as name, contact information, signature, Social Security number, passport number, and medical, insurance, financial, education and employment information.
Our affiliates; our customers; service providers that provide services such as payroll, background check vendors, consulting, training, expense management, medical/health, IT, and other services; health, insurance, and benefits providers; professional advisors, such as accountants, auditors, bankers, and lawyers; third-party travel providers, for business travel purposes; public and governmental authorities, such as regulatory authorities and law enforcement
Characteristics of protected classifications
under California or federal law, such as sex, age, gender, race, disability, religion, medical conditions, citizenship, military/veteran status, gender identity and expression, primary language, immigration status, and requests for leave
Our affiliates; service providers that provide services such as payroll, consulting, training, expense management, medical/health, IT, and other services; health, insurance, and benefits providers; professional advisors, such as accountants, auditors, bankers, and lawyers; third-party travel providers, for business travel purposes; public and governmental authorities, such as regulatory authorities and law enforcement
Commercial information
, such as purchasing information and payment history related to business and travel expenses
Our affiliates; service providers that provide services such as payroll, consulting, training, expense management, medical/health, IT, and other services; health, insurance, and benefits providers; professional advisors, such as accountants, auditors, bankers, and lawyers; third-party travel providers, for business travel purposes; public and governmental authorities, such as regulatory authorities and law enforcement
Internet or network activity information
, such as browsing history and interactions with our and others’ websites, applications, and systems
Our affiliates; service providers that provide services such as payroll, consulting, training, expense management, medical/health, IT, and other services; health, insurance, and benefits providers; professional advisors, such as accountants, auditors, bankers, and lawyers; public and governmental authorities, such as regulatory authorities and law enforcement
Telecommunication information
, such as name, e-mail address, phone number, call history, SMS history (not messages), data usage, network traffic, SIM, device identifiers (if device is managed)
Our affiliates; service providers that provide services such as payroll, consulting, training, expense management, IT, and other services; professional advisors, such as accountants, auditors, bankers, and lawyers; public and governmental authorities, such as regulatory authorities and law enforcement
Geolocation data
, such as device location, approximate location derived from IP address
Our affiliates; service providers that provide services such as payroll, consulting, training, expense management, medical/health, IT, and other services; health, insurance, and benefits providers; professional advisors, such as accountants, auditors, bankers, and lawyers; public and governmental authorities, such as regulatory authorities and law enforcement
Audio, electronic, visual, and similar information
, such as call and video recordings, security camera footage, and information about the use of electronic devices and systems
Our affiliates; service providers that provide services such as payroll, consulting, training, expense management, medical/health, IT, and other services; health, insurance, and benefits providers; professional advisors, such as accountants, auditors, bankers, and lawyers; public and governmental authorities, such as regulatory authorities and law enforcement
Education information
subject to the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, such as student transcripts and confirmation of graduation
Our affiliates; service providers that provide services such as payroll, training, expense management, medical/health, IT, and other services; professional advisors, such as accountants, auditors, bankers, and lawyers; public and governmental authorities, such as regulatory authorities and law enforcement
Professional or employment-related information
, such as work history and prior employer, information from reference checks, employment application, membership in professional organizations, personnel files, personal qualifications and training, eligibility for promotions and other career-related information, work preferences, business expenses, wage and payroll information, benefit information, information on leaves of absence or PTO, performance reviews, and information on internal investigations
Our affiliates; service providers that provide services such as payroll, consulting, training, expense management, medical/health, IT, and other services; health, insurance, and benefits providers; professional advisors, such as accountants, auditors, bankers, and lawyers; third-party travel providers, for business travel purposes; public and governmental authorities, such as regulatory authorities and law enforcement
Inferences
drawn from any of the personal information listed above to create a profile about, for example, an individual’s preferences, characteristics, predispositions, and abilities
Our affiliates; service providers that provide services such as payroll, training, expense management, medical/health, IT, and other services; professional advisors, such as accountants, auditors, bankers, and lawyers; public and governmental authorities, such as regulatory authorities and law enforcement
Sensitive Personal Information
Personal information that reveals an individual’s Social Security, driver’s license, state identification card, or passport number; account log-in, financial account, debit card, or credit card number in combination with any required security or access code, password, or credentials allowing access to an account; precise geolocation; racial or ethnic origin, religious or philosophical beliefs, citizenship, immigration status, or union membership; the contents of mail, email, and text messages unless Jamf is the intended recipient of the communication;
The processing of biometric information for the purpose of uniquely identifying an individual;
Personal information collected and analyzed may include an individual’s racial and ethnic origin, gender, veteran status, disability status, marital status, and LGBTQIA+ status , for DEIB reporting and government employment reporting. These identifiers may be optional, except where required by law;
Personal information collected and analyzed concerning an individual’s health; and
Personal information collected and analyzed concerning an individual’s sex life or sexual orientation.
Our affiliates; service providers that provide services such as analysis, payroll, benefits, consulting, reporting, training, expense management, medical/health, IT, and other services; health, insurance, and benefits providers; professional advisors, such as accountants, auditors, bankers, and lawyers; third-party travel providers, for business travel purposes; public and governmental authorities, such as regulatory authorities and law enforcement
We do not “sell” or “share” your personal information, including your sensitive personal information, as defined under the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018, as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act. We have not engaged in such activities in the 12 months preceding the date this notice was last updated.
Without limiting the foregoing, we do not “sell” or “share” the personal information, including the sensitive personal information, of minors under 16 years of age.
Purposes for the Collection, Use, and Disclosure of Sensitive Personal Information
We collect, use, and disclose sensitive personal information for purposes of performing services for our business, providing services as requested by you, ensuring the security and integrity of our business, infrastructure, and the individuals we interact with, establishing and maintaining your employment relationship with us, ensuring the diversity of our workforce, complying with legal obligations, managing payroll and corporate credit card use, administering and providing benefits, securing the access to, and use of, our facilities, equipment, systems, networks, applications, and infrastructure, preventing, detecting, and investigating security incidents, resisting, and responding to fraud or illegal activities, and ensuring the physical safety of individuals, and other collection and processing that is not for the purpose of inferring characteristics about an individual. We do not use or disclose sensitive personal information for additional purposes.
Individual Requests
You may, subject to applicable law, make the following requests:
You may request that we disclose to you the following information:
a. The categories of personal information we collected about you and the categories of sources from which we collected such personal information;
b. The business or commercial purpose for collecting
personal information about you; and
c. The categories of personal information about you that we otherwise disclosed, and the categories of third parties to whom we disclosed such personal information.
You may request to correct inaccuracies in your personal information.
You may request to have your personal information deleted.
You may request to receive the specific pieces of your personal information, including a copy of the personal information you provided to us in a portable format.
We will not unlawfully retaliate against you for making an individual request. To make a request, please contact us at either
privacy@jamf.com
or 888-755-1421. We will verify and respond to your request consistent with applicable law, taking into account the type and sensitivity of the personal information subject to the request. We may need to request additional personal information from you to verify your identity and protect against fraudulent requests. If you maintain a password-protected account with us, we may verify your identity through our existing authentication practices for your account and require you to re-authenticate yourself before disclosing or deleting your personal information. If you make a request to delete, we may ask you to confirm your request before we delete your personal information.
Authorized Agents
If an agent would like to make a request on your behalf as permitted by applicable law, the agent may use the submission methods noted in the section entitled “Individual Requests.” As part of our verification process, we may request that the agent provide, as applicable, proof concerning their status as an authorized agent. In addition, we may require that you verify your identity as described in the section entitled “Individual Requests” or confirm that you provided the agent permission to submit the request.
Back to Top
Cookie Settings
By clicking “Accept All Cookies”, you agree to the storing of cookies on your device to enhance site navigation, analyze site usage, and assist in our marketing efforts.
Cookie Settings
Reject All
Accept All Cookies
Privacy Preference Center
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
More information
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
View Vendor Details‎
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
View Vendor Details‎
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
View Vendor Details‎
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
View Vendor Details‎
Back Button
Vendors List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 7
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/ANNEX-I-introduction-dpf?tabset-35584=2:
You need to enable JavaScript to run this app.
Please wait while application initialize...
;
Sub-policy 8
https://globalprivacycontrol.org/:
GPC signal not detected.
Please
download a browser/extension
that supports it.
Take control of your privacy.
Online privacy should be accessible to everyone. It starts with a simpler way to exercise your rights.
Get Started
Get Involved
Read the Latest Press Release
and
Follow @globalprivctrl on Twitter
.
Turn On
GPC
Enable Global Privacy Control to communicate your privacy preference.
Send the Signal
Your browser will send the
GPC
signal to websites you visit.
Exercise Your Rights
Participating websites can respect your privacy rights accordingly.
You may have noticed “Do Not Sell” and “Object To Processing” links around the web from companies complying with privacy regulations. To opt out of websites selling or sharing your personal information, you need to click these links for every site you visit.
Now you can exercise your legal privacy rights in one step via Global Privacy Control (
GPC
), required under the California Consumer Protection Act (CCPA).
Together, over a dozen organizations are developing the
GPC
specification.
Get Involved
GPC
lets users signal their desired privacy, just by browsing.
GPC
is available as part of several major browsers, extensions, and websites.
View Full Spec
Test against the reference server
The
GPC
signal will be intended to communicate a Do Not Sell request from a global privacy control, as per
CCPA-REGULATIONS §999.315
for that browser or device, or, if known, the consumer. Under the GDPR, the intent of the
GPC
signal is to convey a general request that data controllers limit the sale or sharing of the user’s personal data to other data controllers (
GDPR Articles 7 & 21
). Over time, the
GPC
signal may be intended to communicate rights in other jurisdictions.
“
CA DOJ is encouraged to see the technology community developing a global privacy control in furtherance of the CCPA and consumer privacy rights.
”
Xavier Becerra
CA Attorney General
“
40 million consumers are now using web browsers and other privacy tools that support this global opt out. Major publishers, the New York Times, Washington Post, have already pledged to respect it. California's Attorney General has already said that companies must respect GPC. This is a big step in Americans privacy, a big, big step forward.
”
Ron Wyden
Senate Finance Chairman
“
My hope is that Governor Northam and the legislature will improve [the newly passed Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act] in the near future in important ways... making it easier for Virginia citizens to invoke their privacy rights, such as through a global privacy control.
”
Mark R. Warner
VA Senator
“
GPC provides a clear and binary indication of an individual's choice... Based on a review of several of the web browsers' intentions regarding GPC, it appears likely to be a prominent, easily understandable, and accessible mechanism in the browser settings.
”
Alexander McD White
Bermuda Privacy Commissioner
“
It's past time to give consumers a real and enforceable way to stop companies from tracking and selling their data. My Mind Your Own Business Act would do just that, and this project [Global Privacy Control] shows it’s possible.
”
Ron Wyden
Senate Finance Chairman
“
CCPA requires businesses to treat a user-enabled global privacy control as a legally valid consumer request to opt out of the sale of their data. CCPA opened the door to developing a technical standard, like the GPC, which satisfies this legal requirement & protects privacy.
”
Xavier Becerra
CA Attorney General
Got to slide
0
Got to slide
1
Got to slide
2
Got to slide
3
Got to slide
4
Got to slide
5
Join over 50 million users.
Download a supported browser or extension and start exercising your privacy rights with GPC.
View All Downloads
Abine DeleteMe
LEARN MORE
about
Abine DeleteMe
Brave Browser
LEARN MORE
about
Brave Browser
Disconnect
LEARN MORE
about
Disconnect
DuckDuckGo Privacy Browser
LEARN MORE
about
DuckDuckGo Privacy Browser
Firefox
LEARN MORE
about
Firefox
OptMeowt by privacy-tech-lab
LEARN MORE
about
OptMeowt by privacy-tech-lab
Privacy Badger by EFF
LEARN MORE
about
Privacy Badger by EFF
lockrMail by lockr
LEARN MORE
about
lockrMail by lockr
Founding Organizations
The following organizations, representing 50 million users and hundreds of thousands of websites, are in support of GPC.
View All Organizations
Featured Press & Announcements
GPC Privacy Browser Signal Now Used by Millions and Honored By Major Publishers
Global Privacy Control
Your browser can tell websites how to treat your data. But companies didn’t have to listen — until now
The Washington Post
‘Do Not Track’ Is Back, and This Time It Might Work
Wired
Tech-publisher coalition backs new push for browser-level privacy controls
TechCrunch
View More Press
Frequently Asked Questions
Global Privacy Control (GPC) is a proposed specification designed to allow
Internet users to notify businesses of their privacy preferences, such as
whether or not they want their personal information to be sold or shared. It
consists of a setting or extension in the user’s browser or mobile device and
acts as a mechanism that websites can use to indicate they support the
specification.
GPC is being developed by a broad coalition of stakeholders:
technologists, web publishers, technology companies,
browser vendors, extension developers, academics, and
civil rights organizations.
The GPC was initially spearheaded by
Ashkan
Soltani
Georgetown
Law
and
Sebastian
Zimmeck
(
Wesleyan
University
) in collaboration with
The New York
Times
,
The Washington
Post
,
Financial Times
,
Automattic (Wordpress.com & Tumblr)
,
Glitch
,
DuckDuckGo
,
Brave
,
Mozilla
,
Disconnect
,
Abine
,
Digital Content Next (DCN)
,
Consumer
Reports
, and the
Electronic Frontier Foundation (EFF)
.
GPC is available for an increasing number of browsers and browser extensions,
listed
here
. If you want to use
GPC, you can download and enable it via a participating browser or browser
extension. More information about downloading GPC is available
here
.
The GPC spec is easy to implement on a wide variety of websites and other
services. The proposed specification and back-end implementation reference
documentation are available
here
.
For additional information, please feel free to reach out on Github or Twitter
(
@globablprivctrl
).
As it is intended to invoke users’ privacy rights, we encourage policymakers
from around the world to engage in the development of this specification. If you
would like to learn more about how GPC could work in your jurisdiction, please
contact us via email at
info[at]globalprivacycontrol.org
.
GPC was initially introduced at the World Wide Web Consortium (W3C)
Privacy
Community Group
(Privacy CG) in April 2020. A
number of stakeholders are part of that community. There are ongoing
discussions in the Privacy CG. Interested parties are encouraged to engage with
the proposal
here
.
Additionally, GPC is currently being implemented across the web. A number of
browsers, extensions, and publishers are supporting or implementing GPC (see
below).
View All
FAQ
s
Get Involved
Contact us to learn more about supporting
GPC
in your browser, app, or website.
@globalprivctrl